To some Americans, the media-savvy Sheriff Joe Arpaio is a law enforcement icon--a charming, principled, straight-shooter whose cowboy-esque persona fits just as well into a spaghetti western as modern day Maricopa County, Arizona. The controversial lawman, who calls himself "America's toughest sheriff," is known for feeding his inmates green bologna sandwiches and forcing them to wear pink underwear, a cost saving measure he claims discourages underwear theft. 

Those who have scrutinized him more closely, such as the FBI, are said to have a different view of the former Sheriff:


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2014/03/07/records-fbi-urged-charges-in-ariz-abuse-of-power-case/6152807/
	FBI urged charges in probe of 'Sheriff Joe,' others

	PHOENIX -- Federal investigators concluded there was sufficient evidence to bring charges against public officials during their years-long abuse-of-power investigation targeting Maricopa County law-enforcement agencies, according to heavily redacted records obtained by The Arizona Republic.

	The records indicate that FBI agents found probable cause to recommend felony counts of obstructing criminal investigations of prosecutions, theft by threats, tampering with witnesses, perjury and theft by extortion.

	...The report makes clear that FBI agents believed evidence was strong enough to prosecute some of those under investigation.

	Arpaio could not be reached for comment, but he has said in the past that the federal probe was politically motivated.


"America's toughest Sheriff," unfortunately, isn't tough where it counts:


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	...MCSO has focused its most intensive law enforcement efforts on low-level immigration offenses over more serious crime from approximately 2006 to the present. MCSO’s prioritization of immigration enforcement has resulted in a failure to meet its other law enforcement responsibilities

	...MCSO’s Chief of Enforcement acknowledged that the majority of undocumented persons in Maricopa County are Latino and described undocumented persons as “the lowest element in our society.” 

	...Statistical reports show an increase in violent crime in Maricopa County, and of homicides in particular, during the period of enhanced immigration enforcement.

	...MCSO has failed, for example, to adequately respond to reports of sexual violence, including allegations of rape, sexual assault, and sexual abuse of girls

	...Faced with such an increase in crime and the risk of harm presented by unaddressed sexual assaults, a law enforcement agency ordinarily would be expected to prioritize more serious offenses, such as crimes of sexual violence, over less serious offenses, such as low-level immigration offenses.


https://goldwater-media.s3.amazonaws.com/cms_page_media/2016/8/31/12.02.2008%252c%20Mission%20Unaccomplished.pdf
	Mission Unaccomplished: The Misplaced Priorities of the Maricopa County Sheriff’s Office

	...Although MCSO is adept at self-promotion and is an unquestionably “tough” law-enforcement agency, under its watch violent crime rates recently have soared, both in absolute terms and relative to other jurisdictions. It has diverted resources away from basic law-enforcement functions to highly publicized immigration sweeps, which are ineffective in policing illegal immigration and in reducing crime generally, and to extensive trips by MCSO officials to Honduras for purposes that are nebulous at best. Profligate spending on those diversions helped produce a financial crisis in late 2007 that forced MCSO to curtail or reduce important law-enforcement functions.


http://www.abc15.com/news/state/breakdown-how-many-unauthorized-immigrants-live-in-maricopa-county
	PHOENIX - The total number of immigrants in our state continues to rise, according to a new national demographic analysis.

	The Center for Immigration Studies recently released an analysis on immigrants in the United States, and Arizona saw an increase to the immigrant population of almost 460,000 from 2000 to 2015.

	...The same study also looked at counties in the nation and Maricopa County totaled 190,000 unauthorized immigrants. That number is 72 percent of the state's total count of unauthorized immigrants.


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/arizona/investigations/2015/09/11/sheriff-joe-arpaio-legacy/71888720/
	And former Maricopa County Attorney Rick Romley, another Republican, said, “I’m not sure he came into office with the primary interest of the public good. That was secondary to what he wanted to do, which was promote Joe Arpaio.”

	Arpaio denies that he craves publicity, but his friends and enemies say otherwise.

	His office has been the set and subject of countless TV shows. He let the action-movie star Steven Seagal stage a reality show with one of his posses. The big coffee table in the waiting area outside of Arpaio’s office is covered with magazines bearing his face, most of them captioned “America’s Toughest Sheriff,” which Arpaio claims was coined by the TV show “60 Minutes.”

	Arpaio’s two books extol his exploits as a cop in Washington, D.C., and Las Vegas and his swashbuckling days as a federal drug agent in Turkey and Latin America. He arrests the bad guys because he is a two-fisted individual who follows his own rules.

	And by living up to that reputation, he is now facing contempt of court — or worse.


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	Sheriff Arpaio’s Persistent and Publicized Violations of the Preliminary Injunction Were Motivated by His Belief that Such Activities Would Benefit His Upcoming Re-election Campaign. 

	...The Court finds that Sheriff Arpaio knowingly and intentionally ensured that the MCSO did not comply with the preliminary injunction. 


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/arizona/investigations/2015/09/11/sheriff-joe-arpaio-legacy/71888720/
	...Despite the ongoing contempt hearings relating to racial profiling, Arpaio’s publicity machine still sends out solicitations for campaign money in exchange for Arpaio’s continued vigilance on the immigration front.

	“Meanwhile, I’ve become the target of defeat because of my support for enforcing illegal immigration laws! This is nothing but pure politics,” said one recent pitch. “But I won’t surrender. And I won’t quit.

	“I don’t care if it’s the ACLU, liberal attorneys or these extreme open-border groups that want to see me gone. I’ve been the Sheriff for over 22 years and I took an oath to protect and defend both the Constitutions of the state of Arizona and the United States — and I will do that for as long as I am in office.”


Despite Sheriff Arpaio's flashy raids and "suppression sweeps", the illegal immigration population increased, with almost three quarters of Arizona's immigrant population residing in Maricopa county. Meanwhile, many Maricopa crimes were left unsolved: 


http://archive.boston.com/news/nation/articles/2011/12/04/critics_tough_sheriff_botched_sex_crime_cases/?page=full
	Arpaio's office was under contract to provide police services in El Mirage as the city struggled with its then dysfunctional department. After the contract ended and El Mirage was re-establishing its own police operation, the city spent a year sifting through layers of disturbingly incomplete casework.

	El Mirage Detective Jerry Laird, who reviewed some the investigations, learned from a sheriff's summary of 50 to 75 cases files he picked up from Arpaio's office that an overwhelming majority of them hadn't been worked.

	That meant there were no follow-up reports, no collection of additional forensic evidence and zero effort made after the initial report of the crime was taken.

	"I think that at some point prior to the contract (for police services) running out, they put their feet on the desk, and that was that," Laird said.


http://abcnews.go.com/Nightline/sheriff-joe-arpaio-unapologetic-tactics-illegal-immigrant-crackdowns/story?id=9219341
	Crimes Overwhelming Cleared as 'Exception' in Maricopa County

	Arpaio's Web site claims he "continues to reduce crime with hard-hitting enforcement methods." It also says that his office has "solved several high-profile murder cases, including nine child murders."

	The department's performance can be assessed by the percentage of crimes that are solved or cleared per year. Most crimes are cleared either by an arrest or by an "exception," such as where the perpetrator is known to police, but can no longer be apprehended. Clearance by "exception" is supposed to be exceptional. But, in Maricopa County, that's not the case. 

	... Pressed to explain why 82 percent of cases were declared cleared by exception, and if his department was writing cases off instead of reducing crime, Arpaio said his department clears more than 18 percent of cases by arrest.

	"We do clear a higher percentage of that. I know that. We clear many, many cases -- not 18 percent," he said.

	"Nightline" contacted the Sheriff's department again after the interview and was told that of 7,346 crimes -- only 944 had been cleared by arrest -- which amounts to only 15 percent. The remaining 85 percent were deemed inactive, unfounded or cleared by exception.

	We asked Arpaio to address allegations that he's reducing crime on paper, but not in practice. "It's a bad allegation..." he said.


http://archive.boston.com/news/nation/articles/2011/12/04/critics_tough_sheriff_botched_sex_crime_cases/?page=full
	Arpaio acknowledged his office had completed an internal probe into the inadequate investigations, but said, "I don't think it's right to get into it until we get to the bottom of this and see if there's disciplinary action against any employees."

	A small number of cases from El Mirage were handed over to prosecutors, but the El Mirage Police Department said most were no longer viable -- evidence dating as far back as 2006 had grown cold or wasn't collected in the first place, victims had either moved away or otherwise moved on.

	Bill Louis, then-assistant El Mirage police chief who reviewed the files after the sheriff's contract ended, believes the decision to ignore the cases was made deliberately by supervisors in Arpaio's office -- and not by individual investigators.

	"I know the investigators. I just cannot believe they would wholesale discount these cases. No way," Louis said. "The direction had to come (from) up the food chain."


http://www.eastvalleytribune.com/opinion/article_0d55b363-2ce6-500e-9f57-372d884e96bd.html
	...the study found the sheriff’s office doesn’t comply with FBI crime-reporting procedures.

	The study profiled the rape investigation of a 14 year-old girl, which was improperly cleared by exception following an investigation that was described as “delayed, incomplete and showed a strong bias against the female victim.” The study concluded “MCSO’s practice of declaring unsolved cases solved presents a clear, present, and urgent danger to public safety.”


Arpaio's less-than-tough stance in crime showed in his management style:


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	At the hearing, the Court discussed the possibility that recordings made by officers other than Deputy Armendariz might also reveal problematic activity, and that other officers would be unlikely to turn in such recordings if that were the case. The Court discussed the need to maximize the MCSO’s ability to retrieve such recordings and to develop a plan for how that might effectively be done.

	...The Court issued instructions that the MCSO was to formulate, with the Monitor’s approval, a plan to quietly gather responsive recordings made by the officers.

	...Sheriff Arpaio agreed that he would cooperate fully with the Monitor and not withhold any information from him. ...Chief Deputy Sheridan did the same.

	...The MCSO violated the Court’s orders that same day. That afternoon, the MCSO scheduled a meeting with the Monitor to arrive at an agreed upon plan to collect the outstanding video recordings. Prior to that meeting but after the Court hearing, Sheriff Arpaio and Chief Deputy Sheridan held a meeting with their lawyers in Arpaio’s office. Without consultation with the Monitor, Sheridan directed Chief Trombi to send an email to 27 MCSO division and bureau commanders directing them to gather video recordings from their personnel.

	...In the following meeting with the Monitor Team that afternoon, the MCSO agreed on a plan in which the MCSO internal affairs officers would individually identify and question—without advance warning—those officers most likely to have videos relevant to this lawsuit and require them to turn in the recordings. ...Chief Deputy Sheridan did not tell the Monitor Team that he had already directed Chief Trombi to send the mass email to MCSO commanders.

	...As a result of Chief Trombi’s email, any officers who might also have recorded themselves in problematic activities were informed in advance that the MCSO was collecting such recordings.

	...The Court further finds for the reasons below that many responsive recordings were destroyed both intentionally and otherwise by MCSO officers.


https://www.abqjournal.com/76894/judge-punishes-sheriff-arpaios-office-for-document-destruction.html
	PHOENIX — A judge overseeing a lawsuit that alleges racial profiling in Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio’s immigration patrols issued punishments against the agency on Friday for its acknowledged destruction of records in the case.

	The punishments issued by U.S. District Judge Murray Snow came in the form of “adverse inferences” against Arpaio’s office that the judge may consider when deciding the case’s facts.

	The judge, for instance, may assume that among the destroyed documents were citizen complaints — some of which were racially charged and didn’t allege actual criminal activity — that requested immigration patrols in spots where the sheriff’s office later conducted patrols.

	...The judge had found grounds in February 2010 to sanction the sheriff’s office for throwing away or shredding some records of traffic stops made during Arpaio’s immigration patrols, but held off on actually imposing the punishment until Friday.

	...Some sheriff’s officials have acknowledged deleting their emails about the patrols and throwing away and shredding officers’ records of traffic stops made during the sweeps.

	The sheriff’s office said the destruction was an honest error that sprung from a top official not telling others in his office to preserve the documents.


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	...The Court finds that at least some officers declined to submit some or all of their responsive video clips out of fear or belief that the clips would reveal problematic conduct. 

	...Chief Trombi’s email survey method provided advanced warning that videos would be collected and thus resulted in the destruction of problematic videos.

	...Sheriff Arpaio did not discipline Chief Deputy Sheridan or Chief Trombi for violating the Court’s May 14, 2014 orders.


http://www.azfamily.com/story/17159125/criminal-pasts-dont-disqualify-members-of-arpaio-posse
	Maricopa County Sheriff's Posse members wear uniforms, have badges, drive county vehicles and some even carry guns. And some of them also have criminal records.      

	"They have as much power as the deputy wants to give them, including the power to arrest under the supervision of that deputy," said Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio.


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	...MCSO Posses Receive Inadequate Training and Oversight

	...Volunteer posse members do not receive the same level of training as sworn MCSO officers.  As acknowledged by MCSO policies, posse volunteers are not qualified to participate in routine law enforcement activities. 


http://www.azfamily.com/story/17159125/criminal-pasts-dont-disqualify-members-of-arpaio-posse
	Arpaio wants his army of 3,000 volunteer posse members to look like sworn deputies and sometimes perform the same duties. But an in-depth project by CBS 5 Investigates uncovered a number of posse members with arrests for assault, drug possession, domestic violence, sex crimes against children, disorderly conduct, impersonating an officer - and the list goes on.           

	These are crimes that are not tolerated in many professions, especially professions with an implied authority.

	"We have about 600 (members) armed with guns," said Arpaio. "We haven't seen any problems with posse men and women shooting people and everything else. Where are all the problems?"

	..."Don't get me wrong, I've done some things in my life that I'm not proud of," said Michael Hoopingarner who admits to being arrested for cocaine possession in 1999. 

	...A posse applicant "could be disqualified" if they have a felony conviction, have used illegal drugs excessively, or sport a misdemeanor narcotics conviction, according to the sheriff's office posse application. Despite Hoopingarner's disclosure, he was hired on the posse.           


http://www.eastvalleytribune.com/opinion/article_0d55b363-2ce6-500e-9f57-372d884e96bd.html
	...when El Mirage contracted with Arpaio for police services, deputies failed to properly follow up on numerous violent crimes, including at least a dozen rapes of women and children.


http://abcnews.go.com/Nightline/sheriff-joe-arpaio-unapologetic-tactics-illegal-immigrant-crackdowns/story?id=9219341
	...before he turned his focus on the border, Arpaio's team of deputies and his so-called volunteer posse were involved in a clampdown on prostitution in 2003. That too wasn't without its difficulties.

	The crackdown reportedly backfired because volunteers were seen on video having sexual contact with prostitutes. Arpaio said that was an "erroneous report."

	"We went into neighborhood and arrested 40-50 prostitutes. The reasons that the cases were dismissed were political reasons," he said. 

 	The county attorney said it was unable to press charges because volunteers had sexual contact with the people they were supposed to be arresting. 

	"They were naked because I allowed them to take their clothes off to develop the case -- that's not unusual," Arpaio said. "They had no sex -- one time, one little case, one woman accidentally put her hand on one of our officers -- one time! And that was it...they've done a brilliant job." 


http://www.azfamily.com/story/17159125/criminal-pasts-dont-disqualify-members-of-arpaio-posse
	...And then there was Jacob Cutler. According to a Flagstaff police report, Cutler threw his girlfriend to the ground and choked her while trying to sexually assault her in 2008. When she didn't cooperate, he allegedly threatened to call police and said they would side with him, because he "has a badge." He was a member of Arpaio's posse at the time.

	Cutler and Hoopingarner attended anger management and drug diversion programs, respectively, and their records were eventually wiped clean. Cutler maintained his posse membership and Hoopingarner was later approved as a member.


But whether Sheriff Arpaio was ignoring crime in the streets or within his own department, it was the people of Maricopa County who bore the cost:


http://www.azfamily.com/story/17159125/criminal-pasts-dont-disqualify-members-of-arpaio-posse
	While combing through thousands of pages of court records and police reports, CBS 5 Investigates discovered that some posse members were behaving as though they were above the law.

	Kevin Ray Campos was arrested in 2007 outside a Scottsdale club for disorderly conduct. According to the police report, he spit on several bouncers and then hurled profanities at a Scottsdale police officer. He pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor, according to court records, and was hired as a posse member a year later.

	..."If the posse members are being given badges, if the posse members are being given guns, then they ought to have the same supervision as other law enforcement agencies have," said Charlton. "Here, that's not taking place and that's reason for concern."

	One posse member with an extensive disciplinary file is Douglas Clark, who also happens to be a constable. Clark has been counseled for rolling a county vehicle, driving 91 mph in a 45-mph zone, using his siren when not on a call, and using red-and-blue lights installed on his personal vehicle to look for something his wife had lost in the road.

	CBS 5 Investigates tracked Clark down and asked him if he feels he is above the law.

	"I can't answer anything on posse stuff," Clark told us. "I'm forbidden to answer anything with the sheriff's office."

	And then there's the accusation from 2007 that a driver backed into Clark's car and then left the scene. Clark allegedly followed the car, rammed the vehicle and held the driver and passenger at gunpoint, all while he was off-duty.

	Yet, Clark still remains in the posse.


Sometimes the cost to Maricopa County taxpayers was quite literal:


http://kjzz.org/content/493449/more-half-maricopa-county-budget-goes-public-safety-criminal-justice
	More Than Half Of Maricopa County Budget Goes To Public Safety, Criminal Justice


http://www.azfamily.com/story/28335869/arpaios-office-accused-of-misspending-up-to-100-million
	Arpaio's office accused of misspending up to $100 million

	PHOENIX (AP) -- The office of an Arizona sheriff known for efforts against illegal immigrants faces accusations that it inappropriately spent $99 million from two jail funds to pay for other law enforcement operations over the last eight years.

	Maricopa County officials say Sheriff Joe Arpaio's office spent some of the money on immigration patrols and a public corruption squad that brought unsuccessful criminal cases against two county officials and a judge.

	An initial estimate in September put the figure at $60 million to $80 million over four or five years.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Arpaio
	The analysis showed that money from a restricted detention fund which could legally be used only to pay for jail items, such as food, detention officers' salaries, and equipment, was used to pay employees to patrol Maricopa County. The analysis also showed that many sheriff's office employees, whose salaries were paid from the restricted detention fund, were working job assignments different from those recorded in their personnel records. Arpaio's office kept a separate set of personnel books detailing actual work assignments, different from information kept in the county's official human resources records.

	Arpaio used the detention fund to pay for investigations of political rivals, as well as activities involving his human-smuggling unit.

	The analysis also showed a number of inappropriate spending items including a trip to Alaska where deputies stayed at a fishing resort, and trips to Disneyland.


http://www.azfamily.com/story/28335869/arpaios-office-accused-of-misspending-up-to-100-million
	Last year, officials asked federal prosecutors already investigating Arpaio to determine whether the use of the money was a criminal violation.

	Interim Chief Deputy Sheriff Jerry Sheridan says there was nothing criminal about the mistake. He blamed an outdated payroll system that failed to adequately track when jail officers were transferred to regular patrol.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2014/03/07/records-fbi-urged-charges-in-ariz-abuse-of-power-case/6152807/
	The FBI's abuse-of-power investigation was launched in 2008 at the outset of a vitriolic political war pitting Arpaio and Thomas against the Maricopa County Board of Supervisors and the county judiciary.

	County officials swept their offices, suspecting illegal wiretaps. Some said they were followed by sheriff's deputies. Others refused to talk on their phones, fearing they were bugged. After county law enforcement's first case against Stapley fell apart, he was arrested without a warrant based on allegations he committed mortgage and campaign fraud. The case eventually was tossed.

	Supervisor Mary Rose Wilcox was indicted on charges alleging conflict of interest, while Superior Court Judge Gary Donahoe was accused of bribery. Thomas and Arpaio filed a federal racketeering charge against them and other county officials. All those cases were dismissed by March 2010.

	Even as the federal investigation was underway, Arpaio, Thomas and their representatives defended their actions, saying they were fighting government corruption.


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	...The former Chief Deputy, acting on behalf of MCSO and Arpaio, filed five separate complaints with the Arizona State Bar targeting attorneys who spoke out publicly against MCSO and Arpaio. Each of these complaints was dismissed for lack of facts or evidence sufficient to support even the initiation of an investigation.

	...MCSO and Arpaio also have used arrests as a means to intimidate and retaliate against persons who have spoken out against their immigration practices. The Opinion and Order in the Thomas ethics matter found, for example: “Sheriff Arpaio, through Chief Deputy Hendershott, closing their eyes to his Constitutional rights, ordered Mr. Stapley [an Arpaio critic] arrested. They never filed any documents or charges but instead surreptitiously videotaped his arrest, and held him in jail for hours. Testimony at the disbarment hearing revealed that no one ever filed anything against Mr. Stapley regarding this event, but the press was called and informed that Mr. Stapley had been arrested.”

	...The Thomas ethics Opinion and Order also described the treatment of Arpaio critics by Arpaio, Thomas and others as “a concerted effort ... to wrestle power from [Maricopa County Board of Supervisors], County officials, and Superior Court judges, and to instill fear in the hearts of those who would resist.” The Opinion and Order concluded that this effort culminated in a “conspiracy ” to indict a judge without cause: “Thomas and [assistant county attorney] Aubuchon quietly met with Arpaio and [former Chief Deputy ] Hendershott behind closed doors.  This shameful gathering had but one motive. The foursome met to conspire about how to muzzle their next most-feared nemesis. After much late-night intrigue by Thomas and Aubuchon, the conclave’s results were revealed the following morning. On December 9th, Thomas and Aubuchon filed criminal charges against Presiding Criminal Judge Gary Donahoe without a shred of evidence that Donahoe had committed any crime.” Judge Donahoe had done nothing more than issue a ruling adverse to MCSO and was perceived to be a critic of Arpaio.

	...The protestor then went to observe the continuing protests. Although this critic of MCSO policies was observing the protest without participating, MCSO unlawfully arrested him when Arpaio, who is very familiar with this protestor, publicly suggested that he be arrested a second time. At the arraignment, the prosecuting attorney admitted that there had been no probable cause for the second arrest. The interim County Attorney later dismissed the charges stemming from the second arrest for lack of probable cause.

	...On repeated occasions, MCSO officers arrested persons who had expressed their disagreement with MCSO immigration policies during the course of County Board meetings by applauding. These arrests were unjustified, as the arrestees did not disrupt the meeting in any meaningful way. Indeed, the judge presiding over the trial of the arrestees found that the arresting MCSO deputy “believes it is his role to make uncomfortable anyone who express[es] views that disagree with the Sheriff” and that Arpaio’s officers had “trampl[ed] on the First Amendment.” The court acquitted the arrestees on its own motion at the close of the State’s case. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2014/03/07/records-fbi-urged-charges-in-ariz-abuse-of-power-case/6152807/
	Eventually, Arpaio's top aide was fired. Thomas resigned to pursue an unsuccessful bid for attorney general and was later disbarred from practicing law. The sheriff backed off his corruption crusade and focused on repairing relations with the Board of Supervisors.

	As of January, the conflicts and legal battles had cost taxpayers at least $44.4 million.


http://www.azcentral.com/story/laurieroberts/2015/04/24/joe-arpaio-contempt-hearing/26316123/
	America's scariest sheriff admitted that he'd hired an investigator to investigate the Department of Justice, which at the time was investigating him and his top deputies for abuse of power. And he admitted that his attorney hired an investigator to investigate the wife of the federal judge who nailed the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office for engaging in widespread racial profiling of Latino drivers.

	The judge who is now considering whether to refer Arpaio to prosecutors for criminal contempt charges.

	Generally speaking, it's not nice to try to intimidate federal authorities. But then again, intimidation has been the name of Arpaio's sleazy game for years.

	Just ask Dan Saban, who ran against Arpaio in 2004 and found himself the subject of a rape investigation. Arpaio opened a criminal investigation in a 30-year-old allegation that Saban, then 17, had raped his adoptive mother. Saban claimed he was the victim. Regardless, the statute of limitations had run out but not the statute of intimidation. Saban lost the election. He sued for defamation and lost but it cost us well over $800,000 to defend Arpaio.

	Just ask former Maricopa County Schools Superintendent Sandra Dowling, whose home was invaded in 2006 by the sheriff's SWAT team, in search of evidence that she'd been stealing, basically, from homeless children. She was later convicted of a misdemeanor, for giving her daughter a summer job. That one cost us $250,000.

	Just ask Phoenix New Times founders Michael Lacey and Jim Larkin, arrested in 2007 in the dead of night after writing a piece critical of Arpaio's sidekick, then-Maricopa County Attorney Andrew Thomas. That one cost us $3.75 million.

	Just ask former Maricopa County Supervisors Mary Rose Wilcox, former Supervisor Don Stapley, former Superior Court Judges Gary Donahoe, Ken Fields, Barbara Mundell and Anna Baca, and a collection of county employees. Arpaio and Thomas in 2008 and 2009 launched a series of corruption investigations, indicting Wilcox, Stapley and Donahoe and accusing the others of racketeering. All charges/accusations were dismissed in 2010. Cost to taxpayers; $7.5 million.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/arizonas-sheriff-joe-arpaio-lost-political-invincibility/
	How Arizona’s Sheriff Joe Arpaio lost his political invincibility

	Arpaio attached himself to Donald Trump, but the alliance could not overshadow what became a repudiation of his mounting legal woes and costs to taxpayers stemming from his patrols targeting immigrants.

	The election also provided more evidence that Arizona voters care little about immigration. Exit polls showed that only about 1 in 10 voters named immigration as the most important issue, and three-quarters said they supported a path to legal status for immigrants.

	...“My thanks and appreciation to the people of Maricopa County for the faith and trust they put in me over the years,” Arpaio said.

	His downfall proved partly tied to a criminal contempt-of-court charge for his acknowledged defiance of a judge’s order in a racial profiling case stemming from his immigration patrols. He also cost taxpayers $130 million to defend him in lawsuits over his tenure.

	...Taxpayers who have already paid $48 million in legal costs in the case will be feeling the financial pain for years. The costs are expected to reach $72 million, due in large part to court-ordered changes in the agency.


And whether a price could be put on it or not, some Maricopa citizens bore a greater share of the cost than others:


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	...Arpaio voiced his biased opinion of Latinos and Latino culture in a book that he coauthored in 2008. In that book, Arpaio singles out Mexicans and Latinos as different from all other immigrant groups in America. For example, Arpaio states that Latinos maintain “language [,] customs [and] beliefs separate from the mainstream,” and are trying to “reconquest” American soil through their migration to the United States.

	...In a nationally televised interview in 2009, Arpaio stated: “They hate me, the Hispanic community, because they’re afraid they’re going to be arrested. And they’re all leaving town, so I think we’re doing something good, if they’re leaving.”


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	The Maricopa County Sheriff’s Office (MCSO) and Sheriff Joseph M. Arpaio (Arpaio) have engaged and continue to engage in a pattern or practice of unlawful discriminatory police conduct directed at Latinos in Maricopa County ...For example, Latinos in Maricopa County are frequently stopped, detained, and arrested on the basis of race, color, or national origin

	...MCSO officers unlawfully rely on race, color, or national origin in their enforcement of traffic laws.

	...In the northeast portion of the County, the study found that Latino drivers are nearly nine times more likely to be stopped by MCSO officers than non-Latino drivers engaged in similar conduct. 

	...The vast majority of people stopped by HSU officers are either United States citizens or are otherwise lawfully present in the United States.

	...In one instance, HSU officers stopped and detained a Latino driver and Latino passengers for a human smuggling investigation because they “appeared to be laying or leaning on top of each other” and “appeared, disheveled, dirty, or stained clothing [ sic ].” However, MCSO pictures taken at the scene show neatly dressed passengers sitting comfortably in the rear of the vehicle.

	...In another instance, MCSO officers stopped a car carrying four Latino men, although the car was not violating any traffic laws. The MCSO officers ordered the men out of the car, zip- tied them, and made them sit on the curb for an hour before releasing all of them. The only reason given for the stop was that the men’s car “was a little low,” which is not a criminal or traffic violation.

	...an MCSO officer stopped a Latina woman – a citizen of the United States and five months pregnant at the time – as she pulled into her driveway. After she exited her car, the officer then insisted that she sit on the hood of the car. When she refused, the officer grabbed her arms, pulled them behind her back, and slammed her, stomach first, into the vehicle three times. He then dragged her to the patrol car and shoved her into the backseat. He left her in the patrol car for approximately 30 minutes without air conditioning. The MCSO officer ultimately issued a citation for failure to provide identification. This citation was later changed to failure to provide proof of insurance. The citation was resolved when the woman provided her proof of insurance to the local court.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/true-crime/wp/2017/08/25/how-ex-sheriff-joe-arpaio-wound-up-facing-jail-time-before-trump-pardoned-him/
	The case that led to former Sheriff Joe Arpaio’s criminal conviction last month, and his pardon by President Trump on Friday night, began in 2007 with a traffic stop in Maricopa County, Ariz., and the wrongful nine-hour detention of a Mexican man holding a valid tourist’s visa.


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	...MCSO has adopted the practice of suppression sweeps—large-scale, resource-intensive operations involving dozens of officers and volunteer posse members—as part of its efforts to enforce immigration laws. 

	...Suppression sweeps are a practice of using a high volume of pretextual traffic stops over a designated period in selected geographic areas in an effort to identify undocumented persons. 

	...The suppression sweeps are not based on reliable intelligence or allegations of criminal activity, lack sufficient operational planning, are not subject to meaningful oversight, and are conducted by MCSO officers, along with volunteer posse members, who are given insufficient training or guidance as to the execution of suppression sweeps.

	...Locations also have been selected for sweeps because of complaints by non-Latino residents that there are Latinos in those areas.

	...Arpaio received a letter stating “[i]f you have dark skin, then you have dark skin. Unfortunately, that is the look of the Mexican illegals who are here illegally. . . I’m begging you to come over . . . and round them all up.” Arpaio labeled the letter as “intelligence,” forwarded it to his Deputy Chief of Enforcement Operations and told the Deputy Chief to “[h]ave someone handle this.”

	...during a crime suppression operation, two MCSO officers followed a Latina woman, a citizen of the United States, for a quarter of a mile to her home. The officers did not turn on their emergency lights, but insisted that the woman remain in her car when she attempted to exit the car and enter her home. The officers’ stated reasons for approaching the woman was a non-functioning license plate light. When the woman attempted to enter her home, the officers used force to take her to the ground, kneed her in the back, and handcuffed her. The woman was then taken to an MCSO substation, cited for “disorderly conduct,” and returned home. The disorderly conduct citation was subsequently dismissed.

	...during a raid of a house suspected of containing human smugglers and their victims, HSU officers went to an adjacent house, which was occupied by a Latino family. The officers entered the adjacent house and searched it, without a warrant and without the residents’ knowing consent. Although they found no evidence of criminal activity, after the search was over, the officers zip-tied the residents, a Latino man, a legal permanent resident of the United States, and his 12-year-old Latino son, a citizen of the United States, and required them to sit on the sidewalk for more than one hour, along with approximately 10 persons who had been seized from the target house, before being released.


https://www.cbsnews.com/news/feds-ariz-sheriff-arpaio-violated-civil-rights/
	...The Justice Department's expert on measuring racial profiling said it is the most egregious case of profiling in the nation that he has seen or reviewed in professional literature, said Thomas Perez, who heads the Justice Department's civil rights division.

	...A review found that 20 percent of traffic reports handled by Arpaio's immigrant-smuggling squad from March 2006 to March 2009 were stops -- almost all involving Latino drivers -- that were done without reasonable suspicion. The stops rarely led to smuggling arrests.

	Latinos who were in the U.S. legally were arrested or detained without cause during the sweeps, according to the report.


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	...The Criminal Employment Squad (CES) is an immigration enforcement unit of approximately 10 MCSO officers that relies primarily on state identity theft laws to interdict undocumented immigrants. CES officers conduct raids at worksites in an effort to arrest undocumented persons who are working without proper authorization. These raids are conducted in a manner that results in the seizure of Latinos without reasonable suspicion.

	...CES officers typically conduct these raids pursuant to search warrants that list specific persons at the worksite who are suspected of being in possession of fraudulent identity documents.  They do not ordinarily obtain arrest warrants.

	...During raids, CES typically seizes all Latinos present, whether they are listed on the warrant or not. For example, in one raid CES had a search warrant for 67 people, yet 109 people were detained. Fifty-nine people were arrested and 50 held for several hours before they were released.

	...In another raid, a U.S.-born Latina was taken into custody for four hours to determine whether she was lawfully in the United States. In response to media inquiries about this incident, Arpaio was quoted as saying: “That’s just normal police work. You sometimes take people in for probable cause for questioning and they’re released.” The only cause for her arrest was that she was Latina and on-site during a raid, reasons insufficient to provide probable cause for the detention.


http://www.nbcnews.com/id/24314764/ns/us_news-life/t/sheriff-raising-furor-immigration-raids/
	Sheriff raising furor with immigration raids

	"I was upset. We did not request them here," said Guadalupe Mayor Rebecca Jimenez, who charged that the patrols were meant to raise Arpaio's profile for his re-election campaign this year.

	Guadalupe, a community of about 6,000 people that relies on the sheriff's office for police protection, is taking steps to find another department to patrol its streets.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2015/06/19/sheriff-church-protection/28996519/
	A sheriff on trial, accused of harassing some members of a minority community, will send armed volunteer posse members into 60 black churches Sunday in response to the racially motivated attack in South Carolina earlier this week.

	...Gang violence is prevalent in the neighborhood where St. Matthew is located, so it is unknown whether the church was targeted because its members are predominantly black.

	In the Phoenix area, indications are that not all of the churches involved want posse members patrolling near their pulpits. When told of one pastor's concerns, Arpaio said at a press conference, "But I'll tell you, he's going to get them whether he likes them or not."


http://archive.azcentral.com/arizonarepublic/news/articles/2008/10/17/20081017MCSOoperation1017.html
	Arpaio raids Mesa City Hall; mayor outraged

	Sheriff Joe Arpaio traded angry words and accusations with Mesa officials Thursday after 60 deputies and posse members armed with search warrants stormed City Hall and the public library in the middle of the night in a hunt for illegal workers.

	...About 30 deputies and 30 volunteer posse members in bulletproof vests and carrying semi-automatic weapons prepared for the operation in Pioneer Park across from the Mormon Temple shortly after midnight.

	The deputies, carrying 25 arrest warrants, headed for the library and City Hall, an eight-story building that houses several municipal departments as well as the mayor's and council members' offices.

	Deputies fanned out and arrested three people; 13 others, including a manager at Management Cleaning Controls, were arrested at residences later that morning, Arpaio said. Ten were arrested on suspicion of identity theft and six for potentially being in the country illegally.

	The 16 arrested included six people who were not named in the warrants.

	...Smith said at a news conference that a Mesa officer came across the deputies about 12:30 a.m. as they staged at the park "dressed in battle gear, with canines and semi-automatic weapons."

	When the officer recognized the men as sheriff's deputies, Smith said, "He was told they were not allowed to tell him what their purpose was. . . . He never got any information. Approximately an hour later, the city was told that they were there for K-9 training."

	Because of that, Smith said, there was enormous potential for death or injury had Mesa police responded to a 911 call from someone who had seen armed men gathering in the park.

	Smith, who appeared distraught as he spoke with reporters, said he also took great offense that City Hall was targeted.

	"The citizens of Mesa, Arizona, this is their City Hall. (It) was, in my belief, violated by another government agency. I don't believe that's proper . . . and I believe that also crosses the line as to what law enforcement should do," he said.

	Arpaio denied questions about whether the raid was politically motivated or that it was timed to deflect attention from a videotape that surfaced Wednesday depicting the brutal death of an inmate at a county jail, which his office runs. The inmate's family has filed intent to sue the county.


http://www.nbcnews.com/id/24314764/ns/us_news-life/t/sheriff-raising-furor-immigration-raids/
	...As for Phoenix, Mayor Phil Gordon said Arpaio should be concentrating on more pressing duties such as finding people with warrants against them, and he has asked for a federal civil rights investigation, complaining the sheriff is singling out people who are "driving with a broken taillight or have brown skin." The U.S. Justice Department refused to comment.

	And in Mesa, Arizona's third-largest city, the police chief has requested two days' notice of any sweeps Arpaio might conduct there, so that his officers can be prepared for any unrest.

	...The crackdowns have led to demonstrations by protesters on both sides of the immigration debate.

	Opponents lined streets in Guadalupe earlier this month, honking horns and holding up signs with slogans such as "Arpaio Stop Using Guadalupe!" One vehicle had "Proud to Be Brown" written on one of its windows.

	Alex Rivera, an American-born landscaper living in Guadalupe, said that during the crackdown there, he saw a Hispanic driver get pulled over twice by deputies.

	"It made me angry," Rivera said. "If they let him go once, it gives you the point that he didn't do anything or he didn't have anything. So they let him go once. And then they pulled him over? Of course, the guy looked totally Hispanic."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Arpaio
	A Federal court monitor was appointed to oversee his office's operations because of complaints of racial profiling. The U.S. Department of Justice concluded that Arpaio oversaw the worst pattern of racial profiling in U.S. history


http://www.nbcnews.com/id/24314764/ns/us_news-life/t/sheriff-raising-furor-immigration-raids/
	Civil rights advocates said Arpaio is spreading fear among Hispanics, illegal or not.

	...Weeks after the crackdown, 20 Spanish-speaking day laborers gathered at a dusty intersection to wait for people to offer them work. Ramon Arajon Contreras, a laborer from Mexico who has lived in Guadalupe for eight years, said the sweep frightened him so much that he hid out in his house until it was over. He said he is still afraid.

	"If I see immigration officers," he said, "it's like I see the devil."


For some Maricopa County residents, citizens or not, Sheriff Arpaio's immigration crackdowns were a nightmare. But for others, the crackdowns and the "tough-on-crime" image that came with them were a part of the Sheriff's appeal. The sweeps and raids didn't do much to stop illegal immigration and other crimes, but Arpaio knew how to exploit them for his own benefit:


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/arizona/investigations/2015/09/11/sheriff-joe-arpaio-legacy/71888720/
	Arpaio or his chiefs would field complaints from citizens about Hispanic day workers gathering near businesses or about people speaking in Spanish in restaurants. Deputies and posse members were sent in saturation patrols to predominantly Hispanic neighborhoods, pulling over drivers for cracked windshields, failure to use turn signals and other minor offenses and asking them for proof of citizenship.

	Then Arpaio held press conferences to publicize the raids and issued press releases to announce the arrests.


http://articles.latimes.com/2010/jul/30/nation/la-na-arizona-immigration-raids-20100730
 	"We're looking for anybody who violates the law," he said. "If we find any illegal aliens, they are going to be arrested."

	 The operation began about 4 p.m. after being delayed for several hours while his deputies responded to demonstrations outside the county jail in Phoenix. During those protests, several people were arrested and others detained, including a legal observer and a news photographer.

	Teams of Arpaio's deputies, followed by media vans, spread out across the city and elsewhere in Maricopa County. By Thursday evening, officials said they had not yet counted the number of arrests.


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	...In its supplemental brief, the MCSO acknowledged that it had no authority to enforce federal civil immigration law. The MCSO also stated that it had been training its officers, especially its Human Smuggling Unit (HSU) officers, to comply with Ninth Circuit precedent to that effect.

	...HSU officers felt that it was the HSU’s duty to make Sheriff Arpaio look good to the media and to the public.

	...On the day the Ninth Circuit affirmed the preliminary injunction, Mr. Casey sent notification of the decision to MCSO personnel and to Sheriff Arpaio’s personal secretary.

	Two days later on October 9, 2012, apparently in light of the Ninth Circuit’s affirmance of this Court’s preliminary injunction, Sheriff Arpaio issued a press release stating: “My back-up plan is still in place and we will continue to take these illegal aliens not accepted by ICE to the Border Patrol.” 

	...When Mr. Casey discussed the Plaintiffs’ allegations with Chief Sands, Sands told Casey that the press releases describing the back-up plan were issued to assist Sheriff Arpaio in his upcoming re-election campaign. 


https://www.csmonitor.com/USA/Politics/2013/0531/Sheriff-Joe-Arpaio-dodges-a-recall-in-Arizona.-Still-is-his-star-waning
	Mr. Arpaio on Thursday sidestepped a recall attempt, just a week after a federal judge ruled that the sheriff's office had engaged in systematic discrimination against Latinos in violation of their constitutional rights. Still, he is wobbling.

	"I don't think he's the political force he once was," says David Berman, a senior fellow at Arizona State University's Morrison Institute for Public Policy.

	..."His days are counted," Alvarez insists.

	Berman is not convinced. Arpaio and his defiance of the Obama administration represent those who hold deep-seated feelings against the federal government – and that sentiment is unlikely to dissipate quickly, he says.

	"He's the real symbol of that opposition," Berman adds.

	It's no surprise to Bruce Merrill, a political scientist who has directed various Arizona polls on immigration, that Arpaio endures even as other immigration hard-liners vanish.

	"He's been the dominant one for a long time," says Mr. Merrill, citing Arpaio's media savvy as one factor.


Sheriff Arpaio, ironically enough, relied on illegal immigrants to get elected.

It's less surprising then that illegal immigration didn't get any better under Arpaio, despite his tactics. In fact, it is questionable whether or not Arpaio ever intended to fight illegal immigration at all:


http://ktar.com/story/94909/study-arizona-most-corrupt-state-in-us/
	PHOENIX — Arizona is the most corruption-ridden state in the nation, a Harvard study said.

	According to the Harvard study said Arizona had the highest instance of illegal corruption — “private gains in the form of cash or gifts by a government official, in exchange for providing specific benefits to private individuals or groups” — when surveying nearly 1,000 reporters.

	To determine the most corrupt states, the authors had reporters rank the instances they see illegal corruption in the different branches of government on a one (least) to five (most) scale. Arizona did not fare well in any ranking, especially the executive and legislative branches, where reporters said they see “very high” instances of corruption.


http://www.nydailynews.com/news/national/3-cops-america-toughest-sheriff-joe-arpaio-busted-role-drug-human-smuggling-ring-article-1.142730
	Three Arizona cops smuggled drugs and humans and laundered money for a vast narco-trafficking ring, all under the nose of the self-proclaimed "America's toughest sheriff," authorities said.

	One of the moles, a female corrections officer, was carrying the love child of a cartel capitán, and all three were accused of leaking sheriff's office tips to help the ring guide smugglers, drugs and cash through the area from Mexico, authorities said.

	...Navarette, a 10-year veteran of Arpaio's anti-human smuggling unit, was arrested when he showed up for work, and a sweep of his apartment found two illegal immigrants hiding there.

	Arpaio said Hernandez was eight-months pregnant with the child of Francisco Arce-Torres, the operation's ringleader, who has ties to Mexico's notorious Sinaloa cartel.

	She and Najera were busted on their way to work at the county's largest jail, and cops said Hernandez had nearly $20,000 on her.

	The arrests were a blow to the tough-talking Sheriff Arpaio, who has been resisting calls to step down amid allegations of corruption, misspending and racial profiling in his office.

	The smuggling ring moved $56,000 of heroin into the area each week, cops said, and each of the dirty cops played a crucial role in keeping the operation underground.


https://www.courthousenews.com/arpaio-jailer-was-a-gangster-inmate-says/
	Arpaio Jailer Was a Gangster, Inmate Says

	PHOENIX (CN) - One of Sheriff Joe Arpaio's jailers tried to have an informant's cell door opened so members of the Mexican Mafia could beat the hell out of him, he claims in court.

	Antonio Lechuga sued Maricopa County, Sheriff Arpaio and Detention Officer Kevin Holsom on Dec. 10 in Superior Court.

	 Lechuga claims Holsom told members of the Mexican Mafia that he was working as "an informant for Jail Intel" at Maricopa County's Fourth Avenue Jail.

	Arizona media reported in January this year that detention officer Kevin Holsome, then 29, was charged with belonging to a criminal street gang. Aside from the spelling of Holsom's name, the reports resemble the allegations in Lechuga's lawsuit.

	...Lechuga claims that on Dec. 12, 2014, Holsom yelled so loudly that all the inmates in the jail pod could hear him say that Lechuga is a "snitch and rat."

	As if that weren't enough, Lechuga says, the next day "Holsom went into the Tower and talked to Lechuga over the intercom. Holsom threatened Lechuga that he would 'fuck him up.'"

	He claims that Holsom then "contacted a known Mexican Mafia member through the intercom and made arrangements to open Lechuga's cell while at the same time opening the cells of other Mexican Mafia members so that they could physically attack Lechuga."

	...Lechuga says he agreed to be an informant after the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office agreed his identity would be kept confidential.

	...The Mexican Mafia is a violent prison gang that is believed to control heroin trafficking in areas of major cities from inside prisons.


http://www.heatcity.org/2009/11/judge-orders-officer-to-apologize-or-face-jail-for-taking-attorneys-file.html
	Judge orders officer to apologize or face jail for taking attorney's file

	If he doesn’t make a grand public apology to a defense attorney soon, a Maricopa County detention officer could find himself inside a jail cell rather than tending them.

	...Donahoe’s ruling held Stoddard in contempt for the Oct. 19 incident in which he could be seen on a courtroom security video sneaking up behind attorney Joanne Cuccia in the middle of a hearing and taking a document from her file.

	During several days of testimony following the incident, Stoddard said he happened to have glanced at the file and saw the words “going to,” “steal” and “money” grouped together in a sentence. It made him think a crime was taking place and gave him the authority to pull the document, he said.


http://www.phoenixnewtimes.com/news/is-nothing-sacred-apparently-not-in-joe-arpaio-and-andrew-thomas-wacked-legal-world-6431742
	The detention officer removed three pages, the contents of a letter from defendant Antonio Lozano to his attorney, Cuccia, who works for the Office of the Legal Defender.

	The officer's maneuver was outrageous on several levels and, perhaps, unprecedented in Maricopa County.

	In fact, New Times could find no other case nationwide in which a detention officer or other courtroom security official had been caught poking around in a defense attorney's file without notifying a judge about his or her emergent concerns.


http://www.heatcity.org/2009/11/arpaio-to-judge-fat-chance-of-apology.html
	Sheriff Joe Arpaio said Wednesday it will be a cold day in Maricopa County before one of his officers apologizes for taking an attorney’s confidential files.

	...In the weeks since then, Donahoe, the county’s highest-ranking criminal judge, has ordered the sheriff’s office to explain why Stoddard believed he had the right to do that. After all, the files an attorney keeps are supposed to be protected by the attorney-client privilege, a near-sacred right in the legal community.

	...Amid all the back-and-forth, the original sentencing of Lozano, the Mexican Mafia member, has been put on a holding pattern. It had been scheduled for a do-over on Wednesday, but earlier this week, the original judge pushed it back to Dec. 14.

	Still, it’s uncertain whether the sentencing will even happen. Lozano’s new attorney, Maria Schaffer, said last week she plans to ask for the charges against him to be dropped in light of everything that’s happened.


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2015/07/24/snow-orders-marshals--retrieve-mcso-evidence-abrk/30647253/
	U.S. marshals raided the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office on Friday in search of evidence after a court-appointed special monitor said the agency had withheld hundreds of documents a federal judge had ordered to be turned over months ago.

	Nearly 1,500 identification cards seized by sheriff's deputies had been marked for destruction in direct violation of U.S. District Judge G. Murray Snow's February order that the cards be turned over, the monitor said in a hearing Friday.

	Further, the monitor said, sheriff's officials had been instructed not to volunteer information to the monitors that the evidence existed.

	...The monitors had already had the chance to view the IDs — driver's licenses, passports and identification cards — and said many apparently belonged to people of Hispanic descent.

	...Snow added that Arpaio's office had been ordered to release all IDs regardless of relevancy, but that it had been "far from forthcoming."

	...One of the contempt allegations stemmed from a former deputy named Ramon "Charley" Armendariz, who took his life last year after a series of confrontations with police.

	Investigators found a stash of driver's licenses, passports, license plates and torn-up citations in Armendariz's home, indicating improper storage policies at best and, at worst, illegal seizures.


http://www.foxnews.com/world/2014/06/02/officer-suicide-complicates-sheriff-arpaio-racial-profiling-case.html
	PHOENIX (AP) –  When sheriff's deputy Ramon Charley Armendariz hanged himself, he left behind a house full of questions.

	Among the items at his house were a stash of drugs, evidence bags from old cases, hundreds of fake IDs and thousands of his video-recorded traffic stops that were withheld in a racial-profiling case against his boss, Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio.

	Now, the quest for answers has raised the possibility that a yet-to-be-determined number of his cases could be thrown out and has refocused attention on Arpaio and his department, already under close watch by a federal monitor in the profiling case.

	The judge overseeing the case has raised the prospect that Armendariz may have been shaking down people living in the U.S. illegally during traffic stops, and the top prosecutor in Phoenix described the situation as a "mess" as his staff begins to sort it out.

	Arpaio's lawyer says the agency hopes Armendariz was a lone rogue officer. "I don't know what triggered him," said Arpaio, whose territory includes the Phoenix area.


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	In the spring of 2014, the Phoenix Police Department responded to a call concerning Deputy Charley Armendariz, who was a significant MCSO witness in the underlying trial. 

	...On May 1, 2014, a search was conducted of Deputy Armendariz’s home.


http://www.foxnews.com/world/2014/06/02/officer-suicide-complicates-sheriff-arpaio-racial-profiling-case.html
	...On May 1, Armendariz was wearing only his boxer shorts and firing a pepper ball gun at an imaginary burglar in his garage. Police believe he was either high on drugs or having a manic episode. Investigators found what they believed to be marijuana, methamphetamines, cocaine and LSD in the home.

	They arrested him, and one day later, he took part in a 90-minute interview with investigators, saying he was innocent and accusing other smuggling squad members of wrongdoing. The deputy then stopped talking and quit his job.

	Police went to Armendariz's home again days later after friends worried he would harm himself. After a nearly nine-hour barricade situation, he surrendered peacefully and was taken to a psychiatric center. Later that week, Armendariz was found dead at his home.


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2015/05/31/mcso-deputy-ramon-armendariz-death-internal-investigations/28178147/
	Effects of 'rogue' MCSO deputy's actions still unclear

	Days before Ramon "Charley" Armendariz would be found dead, he phoned Lydia Guzman, a confidant and local Latino civil-rights advocate.

	The former Maricopa County Sheriff's deputy seemed desperate, Guzman said.

	In the past several hours, Armendariz had resigned, engaged in a dramatic nine-hour standoff with police and was arrested in connection with drug and drug-paraphernalia charges.

	A search of his north Phoenix home unearthed an incriminating yet puzzling stash of personal property. The trove included several hundred items of evidence, including license plates, credit cards, driver's licenses and torn-up citations.

	"It's not mine, it's not all mine," Guzman recalls Armendariz telling her, through sobs.

	...Armendariz was vindicated on April 23, when a federal judge confirmed in court that he was, at least in some ways, telling the truth.

	In a contempt of court hearing for Sheriff Joe Arpaio and four of his top aides stemming from a 2007 class-action racial-profiling suit, U.S. District Judge G. Murray Snow briefly questioned Chief Deputy Jerry Sheridan about the human-smuggling unit's proper handling of evidence.

	"The truth was that the property found at Armendariz's house was often not seized by Armendariz, was it?" Snow asked rhetorically of Sheridan, one of the officials named in the contempt allegations. "It was seized by other deputies."


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	Cisco Perez, an HSU deputy terminated for untruthfulness, made generalized allegations in his subsequent state unemployment hearing. These allegations included that HSU officers commonly “pocketed” shirts, flags, statues, drug paraphernalia, and on at least one occasion a 62 inch flat screen television “for training purposes” during their operations with the approval of their supervisors. 


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2015/05/31/mcso-deputy-ramon-armendariz-death-internal-investigations/28178147/
	...In the year since his death, Armendariz has inadvertently helped launch dozens of internal and criminal investigations into his coworkers, prompted a contempt-of-court allegation against his bosses, and fixed a spotlight on what critics say are "heinous" internal investigations by the Sheriff's Office.

	Records released late last week shed more light on the cracks in the department's internal affairs procedures. The reports revealed insufficient deputy oversight and responses to citizen complaints, but failed to mention any of the criminal investigations or answer how the misappropriated evidence found itself in Armendariz's garage.


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	...To the extent that the investigation only involved Detective Frei’s failure to turn in property to the Property and Evidence room...


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2015/05/31/mcso-deputy-ramon-armendariz-death-internal-investigations/28178147/
	...Potentially mishandled evidence, grounds for an internal investigation, wasn't limited to Armendariz's home. License plates were tacked to the walls of HSU headquarters as trophies, according to courtroom testimony. Boxes and lockers at former HSU facilities were stuffed with hundreds of IDs and dozens of license plates that were never submitted to the evidence room.


http://kjzz.org/content/308856/10-key-findings-civil-contempt-ruling-against-sheriff-joe-arpaio
	The other internal investigations were into the misconduct related to the items in Armendariz’s garage (more on that in item 8) and allegations that deputies had a widespread practice of seizing identifications and other possessions, including from Latino drivers in the plaintiff class.

	...Immediately Snow raised questions about whether Armendariz was shaking down immigrants.

	Before Armendariz died, he alleged in an interview with the MCSO that the items in his garage belonged to the entire Human Smuggling Unit. He said a female coworker removed items stored in HSU offices and placed them in his garage because she “got word of an upcoming inspection by the Internal Affairs Division.” Though Montoya initially denied any involvement, she later acknowledged dropping some items off at Armendariz's residence and loading other items into his vehicle.

	But Snow finds that “[e]ven after Officer Montoya confessed as much, there was no further investigation or reassessment of her involvement, or that of anyone else, in the possible mishandling or theft of property in either an administrative or a criminal investigation.”

	Montoya was apparently spared from taking a polygraph test after experiencing a panic attack, according to testimony in the contempt hearing. Neither she nor anyone else received any discipline in connection to the items in the garage that were apparently stolen from members of the public.

	...One of the items that was investigated was a license plate that belonged to a woman by the name of Manuela Ruiz Hernandez. Snow’s ruling says Hernandez reported that a female deputy took the plate after asking her if she was a citizen, a Mexican and whether she was “illegal” and a “wetback.” Snow writes there is evidence the stop was made by Deputy Amie Duong, but MCSO only sustained allegations of misconduct against the deceased Armendariz, not Duong.

	Snow also finds the sheriff’s office purposely delayed internal investigations related to Armendariz’s garage so they could not be evaluated in the evidentiary hearing.

	...After the discovery of all of the IDs in Armendariz’s garage in May 2014, Snow wanted to know if there was a widespread practice of improperly seizing IDs from the public, and the plaintiff class of Latino motorists in particular. He ordered any IDs in the possession of the MCSO should be turned over to the court. The sheriff’s office was also under an order to notify the court as soon as there is an internal affairs investigation that relates to this case.

	In early July a sergeant tried to put 1,459 IDs in the agency’s Property and Evidence department for destruction. The supervisor, who was aware of the court order, refused. Internal Affairs investigators were notified about the IDs, as was one of the sheriff’s attorneys, Michele Iafrate.

	The sheriff’s office did not notify the court’s independent monitoring team about the IDs or the internal investigation into them, since Iafrate said she was going to research whether the IDs in this instance fell under the court’s order. Chief Deputy Jerry Sheridan suspended the investigation.


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	The Armendariz search uncovered more than 1600 items including approximately 500 drivers’ licenses, “tons” of license plates, weapons, illegal drugs both in MCSO evidence bags and otherwise including methamphetamine, marijuana, LSD, heroin, and oxycodone, a black purse with items in it, vehicle registrations, cell phones, wallets, a scale, drug paraphernalia, thumbdrives, memory cards, currency, and other items of personal property. ...All of these items were apparently taken from people during HSU stops. 

	...The Armendariz matter should have been considered as part of the evidence—indeed, the bulk of the evidence—when assessing the validity of the Cisco Perez allegations.

	By largely disregarding the Armendariz evidence in the Cisco Perez criminal investigation, the PSB and the assigned criminal investigator, Sergeant Tennyson, could investigate the otherwise largely unsupported Cisco Perez allegations without taking into account the corroborating physical evidence of “pocketing” that the items in Deputy Armendariz’s garage provided.

	...HSU leaders were quite aware of the ongoing Armendariz investigation and one of its topics before the Cisco Perez criminal investigation even began.

	...some of the property that Perez "pocketed" found its way to Armendariz's garage

	...As a result, although the property in Deputy Armendariz’s garage was not taken into consideration when determining the outcome of the criminal investigation into the Cisco Perez allegations, that outcome was used to determine that no ‘further’ criminal investigation into the property found in the Armendariz garage was necessary. Due to this sleight-of-hand circumvention, the PSB never conducted a criminal investigation to attempt to determine the source of the drugs, currency, weapons, credit cards, bank cards,or other property in Armendariz’s home.  

	...The Court finds that Defendants engaged in a cursory and bad faith investigation


http://www.azfamily.com/story/28392056/corruption-case-dismissed-against-former-arizona-deputy
	Corruption case dismissed against former Arizona deputy

	PHOENIX (AP) -- A corruption case against a former Arizona sheriff's deputy accused of helping a heroin smuggling ring was formally dismissed Tuesday after key wiretap evidence had to be tossed out.

	The move was expected after prosecutors took the blame recently for failing to file a wiretap application with the court in the case involving former sheriff's Deputy Alfredo Navarrette, a one-time member of Sheriff Joe Arpaio's anti-smuggling squad.

	Without that document, prosecutors had to reverse themselves and ask a judge to dismiss charges against Navarrette and five others, including two other former sheriff's employees and the man accused of being the ring leader. Authorities say the ring leader was working with a high-ranking Sinaloa drug cartel figure.

	Prosecutors also are seeking to void convictions they secured against 11 others who have already pleaded guilty to drug charges in the case.

	The collapse comes as a judge presiding over a racial profiling case against the sheriff's office has grown frustrated over what he said were inadequate internal investigations into wrongdoing by Arpaio's smuggling squad, including whether another former deputy was shaking down immigrants who were in the country illegally.

	...Maricopa County Attorney Bill Montgomery's office, which was prosecuting Navarrette, declined comment Tuesday.

	More than two weeks ago, Montgomery took blame for the missing wiretap application. "This is our mistake," Montgomery said. "We have to own it."


http://www.eastvalleytribune.com/local/article_a81436ba-b237-11df-b5b8-001cc4c002e0.html
	Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio's 2012 re-election campaign committee will be fined for sending out mailers deemed illegal by the county election department's finance committee because they sought the defeat of Interim Maricopa County Rick Romley.

	The order, determined by Jeff Messing, legal counsel to the Maricopa County Attorney's Office, said the Arpaio committee sent out mailers that effectively advocated against Romley or in favor of Romley's Republican primary foe, Bill Montgomery, in Tuesday's election.


Sheriff Arpaio would certainly benefit if, for instance, he and his posse were pocketing contraband like drugs, weapons, and IDs from traffic stops and raids under his watch. Such items would fetch a handsome price on the black market. And should the original owners of these items be illegal immigrants, they might find it more desirable to give up their valuables than risk deportation, and Arpaio and his posse might find it more profitable to take their valuables than to arrest them. After all, were these items to be sold back on the black market in Maricopa County, Arpaio and his posse could just confiscate them again.

Or, at least, such a scheme would be profitable if Arpaio didn't have to face justice.

For Arpaio, justice had been a long time coming:


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2014/03/07/records-fbi-urged-charges-in-ariz-abuse-of-power-case/6152807/
	...In the newly released FBI referrals, agents said there was evidence to prosecute at least two Maricopa County officials for conspiracy and obstruction. In other segments of the report, agents recommended criminal charges against several unnamed officials for theft by extortion, improperly influencing a public official, perjury and conspiracy.

	Paul Charlton, who once served as a U.S. attorney for Arizona, reviewed the documents Thursday but said "it's impossible to know anything of substance" because of the redactions.

	Charlton, who defended Stapley, said it can be difficult to reconcile investigators' conclusions with prosecutors' decisions.

	...The records indicate that FBI agents found probable cause to recommend felony counts of obstructing criminal investigations of prosecutions, theft by threats, tampering with witnesses, perjury and theft by extortion.

	Ultimately, federal prosecutors in August 2012 closed the three-year FBI criminal investigation and grand-jury probe into Sheriff Joe Arpaio, former County Attorney Andrew Thomas and their top deputies, saying there would be no indictments


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Arpaio
	Arpaio's and Thomas' actions in these matters led to Thomas' disbarment by a disciplinary panel of the Arizona Supreme Court, which found that Thomas "outrageously exploited power, flagrantly fostered fear, and disgracefully misused the law" while serving as Maricopa County Attorney. The panel found "clear and convincing evidence" that Thomas brought unfounded and malicious criminal and civil charges against political opponents, including four state judges and the Arizona Attorney General. "Were this a criminal case," the panel concluded, "we are confident that the evidence would establish this conspiracy beyond a reasonable doubt."

	...Arpaio was investigated for politically motivated and "bogus" prosecutions, which a former U.S. Attorney called "utterly unacceptable". Phoenix Mayor Phil Gordon called Arpaio's "long list" of questionable prosecutions "a reign of terror".


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/wireStory/trump-pardon-arpaio-wiggles-legal-trouble-49450681
	 In his 24 years as metro Phoenix's sheriff, Joe Arpaio survived scandals and dodged investigations that would easily have sunk the careers of many politicians.

	He locked up journalists and made criminal cases against political adversaries who tangled with him, investigated judges and misspent $100 million in jail funds. He let investigations into child rape cases languish because officers were pulled away, in part, to help in Arpaio's immigrant efforts.

	Arpaio was found to have violated the civil rights of Latinos in a racial-profiling case expected to cost taxpayers $92 million by next summer.

	His critics felt like they finally won a measure of accountability against the lawman after he was found guilty earlier this month on a misdemeanor contempt charge for flouting the courts in carrying out his signature immigration patrols.


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2017/06/23/joe-arpaio-criminal-contempt-trial/418051001/
	Justice Department officials declined to comment for this article, but motions indicate its attorneys are fed up with the defense’s stall and diversion tactics.

	Their filings have pushed back against nearly move defense attorneys attempted, their verbiage indicating thinly veiled exasperation.

	“Six days before trial is scheduled to begin and for the third time in four months, the defendant asks the Court to stay proceedings,” prosecutors opened in their response to the matter.

	“In an attempt to turn this trial into a referendum on immigration policy, the defendant seeks the Attorney General’s testimony regarding 2017 Department of Justice policies,” they said on the Sessions matter.

	Arpaio declined to say much on his pending trial. In a brief interview with The Arizona Republic last week, he said he’s trying to be careful with pretrial publicity.

	When pressed, he reverted to his longstanding talking points on the matter: that his legal woes were retaliation from the previous, Democratic administration.

	“It’s been something that’s been in the works since 2007, right after Obama took office, and now here we are, 10 years later,” he said. “I’ll be glad to get this over with.”


Sheriff Arpaio's most recent legal trouble, during which the destruction of records in violation of a court order and evidence of pocketing were uncovered, went this way:

A Federal program allows ICE to share responsibility for enforcing immigration law with local law enforcement:


https://www.ice.gov/287g
	U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) is responsible for enforcing federal immigration laws as part of its homeland security mission. ICE works closely with federal, state and local law enforcement partners in this mission. The 287(g) program, one of ICE's top partnership initiatives, allows a state or local law enforcement entity to enter into a partnership with ICE, under a joint Memorandum of Agreement (MOA), in order to receive delegated authority for immigration enforcement within their jurisdictions.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Immigration_and_Nationality_Act_Section_287%28g%29
	The US Justice Department has found that some localities participating in the 287(g) program have used their authority to commit large scale pattern or practice constitutional violations. For example, Maricopa, Arizona Sheriff Joe Arpaio...


Arpaio's department was signed-on to this program. When some of the abuses mentioned above were discovered in a class action lawsuit for racial profiling, this authority was revoked:


http://azcapitoltimes.com/news/2012/06/25/homeland-security-revokes-287g-immigration-check-agreements-in-arizona/
	DHS in December revoked the Maricopa County Sheriff’s Office’s 287(g) task force agreement in response to allegations from the U.S. Department of Justice that the agency and Sheriff Joe Arpaio engaged in widespread racial profiling and civil rights violations against Latinos.


And the judge in the case issued a preliminary injunction saying as much:


https://www.americanbar.org/publications/insights_on_law_andsociety/14/winter-2014/understanding-injunctions.html
	Preliminary injunction—These types of injunctions are generally meant to preserve a status quo of action or inaction, pending a final decision of a case. Unlike temporary restraining orders, preliminary injunctions cannot be issued without advanced notice to the other party in the case. Preliminary injunctions remain in effect, unless otherwise modified or dissolved, during the pending court case. Preliminary injunctions are common in court-related media reports. For example, New York Yankees baseball player Alex Rodriguez recently petitioned a federal court for a preliminary injunction to stop his suspension from going into effect, pending litigation.


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2017/07/31/maricopa-county-sheriff-joe-arpaio-found-guilty-criminal-contempt-court/486278001/
	on December 23, 2011, Judge Snow issued an order granting in part and denying in part their motions for summary judgment.

		...MCSO and all of its officers are hereby enjoined from detaining any person based only on knowledge or reasonable belief, without more, that the person is unlawfully present within the United States

	...On May 24, 2013, Judge Snow issued a permanent injunction enjoining the MCSO from “[d]etaining, holding, or arresting Latino occupants of vehicles in Maricopa Country based on a reasonable belief, without more, that such persons were in the country without authorization” among other things.


But Arpaio wilfully violated the injunction:


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	Sheriff Arpaio knowingly ignored the Court’s order because he believed that his popularity resulted, at least in part, from his enforcement of immigration laws. (Doc. 1017 at Tr. 277:5–13; Ex . 196C (August 31, 2012 interview with Fox News in which Arpaio states: “[T]hey like me because I’m enforcing the illegal immigration laws. So I think that should send a message that I am doing what the people elected me to do.”).) He also believed that it resulted in generous donations to his campaign. (Ex. 196D (August 31, 2012 Fox News interview in which Arpaio states: “I’ve raised 7.5 million [dollars] just to run fo r Sheriff . . . .”); Ex. 201B (April 13, 2012 interview in which Arpaio refers to the “big bucks” he is raising).) 


http://www.latimes.com/nation/la-na-joe-arpaio-testifies-20151001-story.html
	In 2012 he was interviewed by Fox’s Megyn Kelly after his office was assigned a federal monitor because the Justice Department found the office had engaged in racial profiling.

	“That’s garbage, total garbage,” Arpaio said of the monitor. “I will never give in.”

	The Arpaio who spoke to Fox News is the dynamic foil to the hunched, bespectacled octogenarian who appeared in federal court Thursday as a witness in his own contempt trial, his naturally sunken eyes puffed and red. A subdued Arpaio watched the Fox recording and others of himself played to show that the Maricopa County Sheriff’s Office brazenly disregarded a federal judge’s order to not profile Latinos during traffic stops.

	“Sheriff,” asked plaintiff’s attorney Stan Young after the Fox interview, “is that you?”

	It was, without question, Joseph Michael Arpaio. But it appeared to be another person entirely from the man who testified in court.

	His face inches from the screen in the witness box as he watched himself, Arpaio spoke in slow tones and one-word responses. He told Young he wasn’t involved in violations of U.S. District Judge Murray Snow’s order to stop profiling Latinos.

	“I never get involved in those types of decisions,” Arpaio said. “I always delegate.”


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2015/04/21/arpaio-contempt-hearing-opens-abrk/26121557/
	Deputy: Arpaio told me to defy court order


http://www.latimes.com/nation/la-na-joe-arpaio-testifies-20151001-story.html
	...Arpaio was shown a last clip of himself by plaintiffs’ attorneys. It was 2013, after he was under Snow’s order to stop profiling Latinos, but before he conceded any wrongdoing.

	It is perhaps one of the last times Arpaio, who calls himself America’s Toughest Sheriff, filled that role on television before an adoring audience.

	“They ought to be thanking me,” he told host Neil Cavuto after an immigration raid, Arpaio’s shoulder in a sling from an injury. “Save these jobs for American citizens.” The host smiled.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation-now/2017/07/31/joe-arpaio-verdict/526253001/
	Judge G. Murray Snow ordered Arpaio’s deputies to stop holding individuals solely on the belief they were in the country illegally. They only were to detain those who were accused of a state crime.

	But Arpaio’s deputies continued to do so for at least 17 months thereafter. During the bench trial, witnesses testified that 171 individuals were illegally apprehended and then turned over to U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement or to the Border Patrol.

	..."The evidence at trial proves beyond a reasonable doubt and the Court finds that Judge (G. Murray) Snow issued a clear and definite order enjoining Defendant from detaining persons for further investigation without reasonable suspicion that a crime has been or is being committed; that Defendant knew of the order; and that Defendant willfully violated the order by failing to do anything to ensure his subordinates’ compliance and by directing them to continue to detain persons for whom no criminal charges could be filed," Bolton wrote in the ruling. "Because the Court finds that Defendant willfully violated an order of the court, it finds Defendant guilty of criminal contempt."


Meanwhile, ICE did a better job of enforcing immigration law than Arpaio:


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2012/jun/24/thousands-protest-sheriff-arpaio-jail
	Thousands in Phoenix protest Maricopa County sheriff Joe Arpaio's tent city jail 

	Religious group holding annual convention in Phoenix joins with immigrant-rights group to rally against conditions in notorious jail

	...Rachel Walden, who works at the Unitarian Universalist Association headquarters in Boston, said the group also gathered Saturday to protest the immigration law.

	"We wanted to stand in solidarity with the immigration groups," she said. "We just wanted to be there to have a big presence and say this is wrong."


https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf
	...As a result of the pattern or practice of unlawful discrimination, Latinos in Maricopa County are systematically denied their constitutional rights; the relationship between MCSO and key segments of the community is eroded, making it more difficult for MCSO to fight crime; and the safety of prisoners and officers in the jails is jeopardized. Constitutional policing is an essential element of effective law enforcement. MCSO and Arpaio’s conduct is neither constitutional nor effective law enforcement. 


http://www.foxnews.com/us/2012/03/20/immigration-protest-blocks-phoenix-intersection.html
	Immigration protest blocks Phoenix intersection

	PHOENIX –  Several people were arrested after a rally in a Phoenix intersection to protest immigration policies of Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio.


https://www.csmonitor.com/USA/2012/0429/Supporters-rally-for-Arizona-s-defiant-Sheriff-Joe-Arpaio
	Supporters rally for Arizona's defiant Sheriff Joe Arpaio

	As many as 200 people, some holding signs touting the longtime lawman, took part in the event northeast of Phoenix in Fountain Hills, where Mr. Arpaio lives and enjoys strong support even as he faces a federal investigation involving accusations of racial profiling during immigration sweeps. Arpaio maintains he's done nothing wrong and is merely doing the job the federal government neglects.


http://www.azfamily.com/story/17205138/dream-act-protesters-released-from-ice
	ICE releases 4 DREAM Act protesters
	Posted: Mar 21, 2012 12:17 AM UTC 

	PHOENIX (CBS5/AP) - Four undocumented students who were arrested while protesting Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio's immigration policies have been released from Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

	"Upon further review, ICE has determined that these individuals do not fall under ICE's enforcement priorities, and the agency has lifted the previously lodged detainees," said ICE spokeswoman Amber Cargile on Wednesday night.

	...The arrested protesters were identified as Ofelia Sanchez, 18, Hugo Sanchez, 23, Daniela Cruz, 20, Viridiana Hernandez, 20, a 16-year-old girl and a 17-year-old girl.

	...Lilly Romo was one of the protesters. Romo is a pre-med major at Grand Canyon University. Romo said protesters wanted to send a message that undocumented students should not have to live in fear of being arrested.

	...One of the targets of Tuesday's rally was Arpaio, who made national news for his immigration enforcement sweeps across the Valley.

	Arpaio told CBS 5 News these students should spend less time targeting him and more time petitioning Congress, which has the power to change federal law.

	"It's a tough situation, this DREAM Act," Arpaio said. "I do have compassion. I understand their concerns, yet enforcing the law overrides my compassion." 


http://www.tucsonsentinel.com/local/report/040212_az_criminal_sweep/34-arrested-az-ice-sweep-criminals/
	WASHINGTON – Federal immigration officials arrested 64 criminals in Arizona last week as part of a nationwide, six-day sweep that netted more than 3,100 people in the country illegally.

	Immigration and Customs Enforcement officials said Monday that the latest Operation Cross Check led to arrests in all 50 states on charges ranging from murder to kidnapping, drug trafficking and child abuse.

	...Morton said ICE data shows that more than half of the 400,000 removals in the past year were criminal offenders. The 216,000 criminal aliens deported last year was up 89 percent from fiscal 2008, he said.

	...Raids by Immigration and Customs Enforcement and other agencies over the last week led to the arrest of more than 3,100 immigrants, including:

	* 68 arrested in Arizona, including 58 in Phoenix, six in Tucson

	* 2,834 criminals arrested nationally, including 1,477 with felony convictions, 50 gang members and 149 convicted sex offenders


http://archive.boston.com/news/nation/articles/2011/12/04/critics_tough_sheriff_botched_sex_crime_cases/?page=full
	EL MIRAGE, Ariz.—The 13-year-old girl opened the door of her home in this small city on the edge of Phoenix to encounter a man who said that his car had broken down and he needed to use the phone. Once inside, the man pummeled the teen from behind, knocking her unconscious and sexually assaulting her.

	...cases were among more than 400 sex-crimes reported to Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio's office during a three-year period ending in 2007 -- including dozens of alleged child molestations -- that were inadequately investigated and in some instances were not worked at all, according to current and former police officers familiar with the cases.

	...In El Mirage alone, where Arpaio's office was providing contract police services, officials discovered at least 32 reported child molestations -- with victims as young as 2 years old -- where the sheriff's office failed to follow through, even though suspects were known in all but six cases.

	Many of the victims, said a retired El Mirage police official who reviewed the files, were children of illegal immigrants.

	...El Mirage police files obtained by The Associated Press through public records requests establish a pattern of sex-crimes not actually being investigated after the crimes were reported to Arpaio's office.

	In April 2007, a 3-year-old girl was reported molested by her father, an illegal immigrant who cared for the child while her mother was at work. When the mother confronted her husband about the abuse, he cried and swore he'd never do it again.

	Yet a few days later, the mother noticed more signs of sexual abuse on her daughter and called for help. After the initial report, that help didn't come.

	...more than 400 cases countywide had to be reopened. Freeman told outside investigators examining alleged managerial misconduct at Arpaio's office that a number of arrests were made in the reopened cases.

	The April 2011 report on alleged managerial misconduct said the sheriff's internal effort to determine what had gone wrong with the sex-crimes investigations was twice derailed.

	One delay occurred when the male sheriff's official leading the inquiry was accused of sexual harassment -- this by a female supervisor whose portfolio included some of the mishandled cases, according to the report.

	...In their follow-up on the case of the 13-year-old attacked by the man claiming to have a broken car, El Mirage police discovered Arpaio's office hadn't interviewed the victim.

	...The case of the molested 3-year-old was returned to El Mirage police unworked five months after the initial report. The family's beige tract home was deserted, the phone disconnected.


Arpaio abused the powers of his office, promoted a policing culture that created resentment in fear among citizens of Maricopa County, oversaw widespread detention U.S. citizens on the basis of the color of their skin, oversaw widespread inappropriate confiscation and storage of contraband from wrongful detainees, oversaw the destruction of evidence relevant to a request by a court, failed to properly investigate and discipline his subordinates, oversaw what might have been the most corrupt police force in the country, oversaw the worst case of racial profiling in U.S. history, and wilfully failed to cease some of the most egregious of these activities when ordered by a court, all at the expense of investigating more serious crimes. For this, he was charged with criminal contempt of court.


But President Trump pardoned him, citing his "admirable service":


http://www.npr.org/2017/08/25/545282459/president-trump-pardons-former-sheriff-joe-arpaio
	The statement issued by the White House said:

	"In 1992, the problems facing his community pulled Arpaio out of retirement to return to law enforcement. He ran and won a campaign to become Sheriff of Maricopa County. Throughout his time as Sheriff, Arpaio continued his life's work of protecting the public from the scourges of crime and illegal immigration. Sheriff Joe Arpaio is now eighty-five years old, and after more than fifty years of admirable service to our Nation, he is worthy candidate for a Presidential pardon."


And President Trump was warned that Arpaio had terrorized Maricopa County and that pardoning him would divide the country even more:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/phoenix-officials-worry-trumps-rally-could-spark-tensions-in-the-streets/2017/08/18/efb4fda2-842a-11e7-902a-2a9f2d808496_story.html
	President Trump is pressing forward with plans for a large-scale political rally in Phoenix next week, despite pleadings from the city’s mayor and other elected officials not to hold a polarizing event while feelings remain so raw over the hate-fueled violence in Charlottesville.

	“I absolutely think it’s inappropriate to be holding a political rally a few days after an innocent woman was mowed down by a neo-Nazi,” said Rep. Ruben Gallego (D-Ariz.), whose district includes downtown Phoenix. “It’s throwing tinder onto an ongoing fire.”

	His words echoed those of Phoenix Mayor Greg Stanton (D), who earlier this week made an extraordinary request for Trump to stay away out of fear that the president’s appearance would “enflame emotions” and draw violent agitators from outside the state’s borders.

	Robbie Sherwood, a spokesman for the mayor, said Friday that Trump had not responded to his request and that the city’s police force was girding for what could be a long night in downtown Phoenix on Tuesday.

	...Stanton and others have voiced heightened concern about Tuesday’s event because of speculation, fueled by Trump, that he could use the appearance to announce a pardon for former Maricopa County sheriff Joe Arpaio (R).

	...In an interview with Fox News earlier this week, Trump said he was “seriously thinking” about pardoning Arpaio, who he called a “great American patriot” and said had “done a lot in the fight against illegal immigration.” Trump indicated he could be making an announcement soon.

	The White House has since been mum about Trump’s intentions. In an interview with NPR on Thursday, Arpaio said he would be honored if Trump follows through but said he hadn’t yet been invited to the rally.

	“It makes me feel good that at least someone is backing me up,” Arpaio said in the interview. “And how much better can you get than president of the United States?”

	He also downplayed safety concerns surrounding Trump’s planned rally.

	State Sen. Catherine H. Miranda (D) said a pardon of Arpaio would be devastating for a Latino community that felt “terrorized” by the sheriff for many years.

	She urged peaceful protest but fears mayhem on Phoenix’s streets, particularly if Arpaio is pardoned during the visit.

	“It just keeps the hatred and racism alive,” Miranda said. “If he does that, it’s not going to be a good day here. What I fear is more chaos.”

	...Presidential historian Douglas Brinkley said it’s not unprecedented for state and local officials to steer presidents from visiting their states because of safety concerns. But that advice is typically given in private, he said.

	“What’s unusual about Phoenix is you have an elected official publicly begging the president not to come to his town,” Brinkley said. “Usually a president coming to your town is an economic boon, and it’s something all elected officials welcome.”

	...Gallego said that he fears the president’s visit is designed to shore up support among his base voters and speculated that pardoning Arpaio could help that task.

	“All he cares about is what’s good for him,” Gallego said of Trump, “and it doesn’t matter if people get hurt as a result.”


Arizona officials also begged Trump not to hold his rally in Phoenix. Trump's speech there gives a hint as to how he felt about their requests and their fears that pardoning Arpaio would make America's divisions worse:


http://time.com/4912055/donald-trump-phoenix-arizona-transcript/
	President Donald Trump on Tuesday lambasted his critics in a 77-minute speech at a rally in Phoenix, as protesters gathered outside.

	...By the way, I'm just curious. Do the people in this room like Sheriff Joe?

	(APPLAUSE)

	So, was Sheriff Joe convicted for doing his job? That's why...

	(APPLAUSE)

	He should have had a jury, but you know what? I'll make a prediction. I think he's going to be just fine, OK?

	(APPLAUSE)

	But -- but I won't do it tonight, because I don't want to cause any controversy. Is that OK? All right?


When asked to put the safety of American citizens and the well being of our country over his own inflated ego, President Trump's response is defiance. Like a brat throwing a temper tantrum.

Trump, like everyone else in America, knows the divisions in our country right now are a serious problem:


https://hbr.org/2017/05/research-political-polarization-is-changing-how-americans-work-and-shop
	After the bruising and contentious 2016 U.S. presidential election, it’s not surprising that Americans’ evaluations of members of the opposite political party have reached an all-time low. According to data from the Pew Research Center, 45% of Republicans and 41% of Democrats think the other party is so dangerous that it is a threat to the health of the nation. This animus has spilled over into social networks: According to a HuffPost/YouGov poll, nearly half of Americans got into an argument with someone (a friend, family member, coworker, etc.) about the election last year. Fifty years ago few people expressed any anger when asked how they would feel if their child married someone from the other party. Today, one-third of Democrats and nearly half of Republicans would be deeply upset. On item after item, Americans not only disagree on the issues but also increasingly personally dislike those from the other party.

	This is a phenomenon scholars call affective polarization. Political scientists have attributed a number of important consequences to the increase of affective polarization in the United States 


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-election-division-insight-idUSKBN13419A
	'Go to hell!' A divided America struggles to heal after ugly election

	ELLSWORTH, Maine (Reuters) - “He lies,” huffed Janet Foster.

	“And he’s a dirty old man,” chimed in her sister Jean as they discussed Donald Trump’s flaws a few days before he was elected the new president of the United States.

	“Well, I am with him,” their brother Paul, 60, interjected, raising his voice over snacks of cheese, muffins and crackers in the family’s living room. “Hillary Clinton is like a puppet - you know it’s all scripted.”

	The 2016 U.S. election was unprecedented in the way it turned Americans against each other, according to dozens of interviews in rural United States and across some of the most politically charged battleground states.

	It divided families like the Fosters in rural Ellsworth, Maine, broke up friendships and turned neighbor against neighbor.

	In a recent Reuters/Ipsos survey, 15 percent of respondents said they had stopped talking to a family member or close friend as a result of the election. For Democrats, this shoots up to 23 percent, compared to 10 percent for Republicans. And 12 percent had ended a relationship because of it.

	There was no comparative polling data from previous elections. But interviews with relationship counselors and voters suggest this election stood out by summoning passions, anger and a divisiveness in ways that will make healing difficult after Clinton’s loss to Trump on Tuesday.

	Sarah Guth, a Democrat in Colorado, says her father - an ardent supporter of Trump - no longer speaks with her after they clashed on Facebook over their political views.

	“He crossed a line,” she said.

	After attending a Trump rally, Guth wrote on Facebook that she saw 10 minorities among thousands of people. “I’m increasingly convinced that this election is about race,” she wrote. “I mean a fear among the white majority that their rule is coming to an end.”

	Some posters told her “to go to hell,” she recalled in an interview. “And then my dad very publicly attacked me, telling me that I should be ashamed of myself.” The two have not spoken since.

	...The divisions tore into the fabric of some communities. In Provo, Utah, Trump supporter Loy Brunson awoke on an October morning to find his car spray-painted with the words “AmeriKKKa” - a reference to “KKK” white supremacists - and “Fuck Trump.” His two Trump yard signs were destroyed.

	“So I doubled down, got motivated and put up 85 signs in my yard,” he said. Within days, all but six of those were stolen.

	...Some blame the divisiveness on campaign rhetoric that inflamed racial, ethnic and class tensions that have long simmered in America. Angry and extremist language moved into the mainstream. 

	...Foster's van was one of 20 vehicles spray-painted outside a Trump rally on Oct. 15 in the city of Bangor. And across Ellsworth, pro-Trump yard signs were stolen almost as fast as they were planted, Republican officials say.

	Foster worries about the divisions ahead.

	“My sisters will forgive me for my political views,” he said.  “But the country is going to be on fire.” 


But he doesn't care. He inflames them anyway.

President Trump's support among his base had been slipping recently, and it's been said the recent rally and pardon would help "energize his base." Others allege Trump thought he could hold the pardon as "leverage" over his opponents, much as he tried to use the threat of a Government shutdown at the rally to coerce Congress into funding his wall. A recent poll found 28% of Americans support new spending for Trump's wall, with 58% opposing.

Trump, taking a page from the strongmen and dictators he so admires, appears to care more about himself than the country. His call with President Nieto shows as much:


https://www.pri.org/stories/2017-05-11/us-mexico-relationship-shaky-start-trump-era
	US-Mexico relationship off to a shaky start in the Trump era


https://www.washingtonpost.com/graphics/2017/politics/australia-mexico-transcripts/
	TRUMP: My people stand up and say, “Mexico will pay for the wall” and your people probably say something in a similar but slightly different language. But the fact is we are both in a little bit of a political bind because I have to have Mexico pay for the wall – I have to. 

	...Because you and I are both at a point now where we are both saying we are not to pay for the wall. From a political standpoint, that is what we will say. We cannot say that anymore because if you are going to say that Mexico is not going to pay for the wall, then I do not want to meet with you guys anymore because I cannot live with that.

	...Believe it or not, this is the least important thing that we are talking about, but politically this might be the most important talk about.

	NIETO: ...This is what I suggest, Mr. President – let us stop talking about the wall. I have recognized the right of any government to protect its borders as it deems necessary and convenient. But my position has been and will continue to be very firm saying that Mexico cannot pay for that wall. 

	TRUMPP: But you cannot say that to the press. The press is going to go with that and I cannot live with that. You cannot say that to the press because I cannot negotiate under those circumstances. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/26/world/mexicos-president-cancels-meeting-with-trump-over-wall.html
	Mexico’s President Cancels Meeting With Trump Over Wall


Trump cares more about saving face for his idiotic promise to get Mexico to "pay for the wall" than the relationship between the United States and one of the only two countries in the world the United States shares a border with, which is crucial for such apparently relatively trivial issues like counterterrorism and the opioid epidemic (https://www.washingtonpost.com/graphics/2017/national/fentanyl-overdoses/), which is said to cause a "9/11-scale loss" in life every three weeks.

Recent events have shown what a person who thinks this way can do to a country:


http://time.com/3719129/assad-isis-asset/
	The regime of Syrian President Bashar Assad has long had a pragmatic approach to the Islamic State of Iraq and Greater Syria (ISIS), says a Syrian businessman with close ties to the government. Even from the early days the regime purchased fuel from ISIS-controlled oil facilities, and it has maintained that relationship throughout the conflict. “Honestly speaking, the regime has always had dealings with ISIS, out of necessity.”

	...Assad does not see ISIS as his primary problem, the businessman says. "The regime fears the Free Syrian Army and the Nusra Front, not ISIS. They [the FSA and Nusra] state their goal is to remove the President. But ISIS doesn’t say that. They have never directly threatened Damascus.” As the businessman notes, the strikes on ISIS targets are minimal. “If the regime were serious about getting rid of ISIS, they would have bombed Raqqa by now. Instead they bomb other cities, where the FSA is strong.” That said, the businessman does not believe that the regime has a formal relationship with ISIS, just a pragmatic one. “The more powerful ISIS grows, the more they are useful for the regime. They make America nervous, and the Americans in turn see the regime as a kind of bulwark against ISIS.”

	A senior Western diplomat who specializes in the Syrian civil war agrees that ISIS is seen as an asset by Assad. “They will do whatever it takes to devalue the opposition, even if it means strengthening ISIS. They know that if it comes to choosing between the black flag [of ISIS] and Damascus, the international community will choose Damascus.” And the strategy has worked extremely well. “The way it’s going now, it’s a matter of months, not even a year, that the moderate opposition is so weakened that it won’t be a factor anymore. So in just a few months from now the regime will be able to achieve its strategic goal of forcing the world to choose between Damascus and the black flags.”

	So by ignoring the conflict between the Syrian opposition and the Assad regime to focus purely on ISIS may solve problems in the short term, says the diplomat, “but there will be more problems to come. These are the ingredients for a further escalation of the conflict — alienating large parts of the Sunni population, so that they have no choice but to join ISIS. Not for ideological reasons, but because they will do whatever it takes to overthrow the regime in Damascus.”


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Syrian_Civil_War#Deaths
	On 20 August 2014, a new U.N. study concluded that at least 191,369 people have died in the Syrian conflict. The UN thereafter stopped collecting statistics, but a study by the Syrian Centre for Policy Research released in February 2016 estimated the death toll to be 470,000, with 1.9m wounded (reaching a total of 11.5% of the entire population either wounded or killed).


But Trump has shocked the world by inflaming racial tensions in his own country, a plague most world leaders in the world would take great pains to prevent, and that some hostile nations are known to foment as a means to wage war. Trump seems to think this benefits him.

What is to be done? If Trump decides to act in a manner hostile to the American people, there isn't much hope in getting him to change--he promised to change before and never did. The only way to secure the nation from such a threat then is to remove Trump from power. If Trump decides hurting his country to help himself is a good "deal," or that holding his own country hostage to get his way is a winning strategy, there's little indication that he'd have a change of heart, or, for that matter, that he has a heart at all.

But maybe this is no surprise. Donald Trump has always been this way:


http://talkingpointsmemo.com/muckraker/trump-charlottesville-heritage-same-rhetoric-white-nationalists-use-recruit
	During his rambling rally this week in Phoenix, Arizona, President Donald Trump scoffed at the idea that anyone would label him a racist for his ever-evolving response to the deadly white nationalist rally in Charlottesville, Virginia. All he wanted to do, he told a crowd of his supporters, was address his concern that an undefined “they” were attempting “to take away our history and our heritage.”

	That language merely puts a presentable face on the racism that left counter-protesters bloodied on the streets of Charlottesville, according to former skinheads and law enforcement who’ve worked with them. Those individuals told TPM that Trump’s comments used the same rhetorical lures that white supremacists and other hate groups rely on to hook new members.

	“It’s dangerous because it creates a distinction between us and them,” said Michael German, a former FBI special agent who during his time in law enforcement went undercover with neo-Nazi skinheads in southern California and anti-government militia groups. “When Donald Trump talks about us and our heritage he’s only speaking to one audience, and that audience then starts to view others who are fellow Americans as somehow the enemy.”

	“The rhetoric draws people in because it makes them feel like they are losing something terribly important. It perpetuates the us vs. them mentality and serves no one,” echoed Angela King, a former skinhead who spent six years in prison for assisting an armed robbery of a Jewish-owned store. King went on to co-found Life After Hate, a nonprofit that works with former members of violent far-right groups.


https://www.theatlantic.com/science/archive/2017/08/the-worlds-worst-support-group/536850/
	How White Supremacists Use Victimhood to Recruit

	...As the KKK leader Thom Robb put it in 1992, according to the study: “The issue isn't who's superior ... Even if we [whites] were nothing but a race of cavemen, we still have a right to preserve our heritage and culture and give that to our children. Nobody has the right to deny that from us. And that is the attempt that's being done today.”


http://chicago.suntimes.com/news/transcript-president-trump-talks-infrastructure-virginia-violence/
	THE PRESIDENT: Excuse me, excuse me. I saw the same pictures as you did.

	You had people in that group that were there to protest the taking down of, to them, a very, very important statue and the renaming of a park from Robert E. Lee to another name.

	Q George Washington and Robert E. Lee are not the same.

	THE PRESIDENT: George Washington was a slave owner. Was George Washington a slave owner? So will George Washington now lose his status? Are we going to take down —

	Excuse me, are we going to take down statues to George Washington? How about Thomas Jefferson? What do you think of Thomas Jefferson? You like him?

	Q I do love Thomas Jefferson.

	THE PRESIDENT: Okay, good. Are we going to take down the statue? Because he was a major slave owner. Now, are we going to take down his statue?

	So you know what, it’s fine. You’re changing history. You’re changing culture. And you had people — and I’m not talking about the neo-Nazis and the white nationalists — because they should be condemned totally. But you had many people in that group other than neo-Nazis and white nationalists. Okay? And the press has treated them absolutely unfairly.


http://talkingpointsmemo.com/muckraker/trump-charlottesville-heritage-same-rhetoric-white-nationalists-use-recruit
	...“The most effective tactics for white nationalists are to associate American history with themselves and to suggest that the collective efforts to turn away from our white supremacist past are the same as abandoning American culture.”


http://time.com/4912055/donald-trump-phoenix-arizona-transcript/
	(APPLAUSE)

	And yes, by the way -- and yes, by the way, they are trying to take away our history and our heritage. You see that.

	(BOOING)

	...In the proud tradition of America's great leaders, from George Washington -- please, don't take his statue down, please. Please. Does anybody want George Washington's statue? No. Is that sad? Is that all (ph) sad? To Lincoln, to Teddy Roosevelt, I see they want to take Teddy Roosevelt's down, too. They're trying to figure out why. They don't know. They're trying to take away our culture. They are trying to take away our history.


http://talkingpointsmemo.com/muckraker/trump-charlottesville-heritage-same-rhetoric-white-nationalists-use-recruit
	...“My dad often gave me the advice that white nationalists are not looking to recruit people on the fringes of American culture, but rather the people who start a sentence by saying, ‘I’m not racist, but …’,” Black, who has disavowed the movement, wrote of his father, Don.


https://www.nytimes.com/politics/first-draft/2015/09/22/in-interview-donald-trump-denies-report-of-fathers-arrest-in-1927/
	...I talked to the presidential candidate about the role his father, Fred C. Trump, played in developing the neighborhood. I also asked him about a 1927 report in The New York Times, unearthed by the website Boing Boing, that listed Fred Trump as being among a group of people arrested, and then discharged, by the police in response to a Ku Klux Klan rally that had turned violent in Queens. The question, essentially, was, “Did you ever hear of this?”

	Mr. Trump’s barrage of answers – his sudden denial of a fact he had moments before confirmed; his repeatedly noting that no charges were filed against his father in connection with the incident he had just repeatedly denied; and his denigration of the news organization that brought the incident to light as a “little website” – shows his pasta-against-the-wall approach to beating down inconvenient story lines.

	...Q. Did your father live on Devonshire Road before that?

	A. That was a different one, that’s where my grandmother lived and my father, early on.

	Q. Have you seen this story about police arresting a Fred Trump who lived at that Devonshire address in 1927 after a Ku Klux Klan rally turned violent?

	A. Totally false. We lived on Wareham. The Devonshire — I know there is a road Devonshire but I don’t think my father ever lived on Devonshire.

	...Later in the interview, Mr. Trump returned, unprompted, to the 1927 report after expressing dissatisfaction with a previous article about him.

	A. And by the way, my father was not involved, was never charged and I never even heard this before. What? It comes out on a website and you are going to write it on The New York Times?

	It shouldn’t be written because it never happened, No. 1. And No. 2, there was nobody charged.


https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/mvke38/all-the-evidence-we-could-find-about-fred-trumps-alleged-involvement-with-the-kkk
	Moreover, three additional newspaper clips unearthed by VICE contain separate accounts of Fred Trump's arrest at the May 1927 KKK rally in Queens, each of which seems to confirm the Times account of the events that day.

	...The June 1, 1927, account of the May 31 Klan rally printed in a defunct Brooklyn paper called the Daily Star specifies that a Fred Trump "was dismissed on a charge of refusing to disperse." That article lists seven total arrests

	...Yet another account in another defunct local newspaper, the Richmond Hill Record, published on June 3, 1927, lists Fred Trump as one of the "Klan Arrests," and also lists the Devonshire Road address.

	...Another article about the rally, published by the Long Island Daily Press on June 2, 1927, mentions that there were seven arrestees without listing names, and claims that all of the individuals arrested were wearing Klan attire.



https://www.nytimes.com/times-insider/2015/07/30/1973-meet-donald-trump/
	Some Americans are just getting to know Donald Trump. Readers of The Times have known him for 42 years.

	They first met him, on the front page no less, on Oct. 16, 1973. Then 27 years old, Mr. Trump was the president of the Trump Management Corporation, at 600 Avenue Z in Brooklyn, which owned more than 14,000 apartments in Brooklyn, Queens and Staten Island.

	“Major Landlord Accused of Antiblack Bias in City,” the headline stated. The Department of Justice had brought suit in federal court in Brooklyn against Mr. Trump and his father, Fred C. Trump, charging them with violating the Fair Housing Act of 1968 in the operation of 39 buildings.

	“The government contended that Trump Management had refused to rent or negotiate rentals ‘because of race and color,’ ” The Times reported. “It also charged that the company had required different rental terms and conditions because of race and that it had misrepresented to blacks that apartments were not available.”


https://www.villagevoice.com/2015/07/20/how-a-young-donald-trump-forced-his-way-from-avenue-z-to-manhattan/
	The new complaint charges that “racially discriminatory conduct by Trump agents has occurred with such frequency that it has created a substantial impediment to the full enjoyment of equal opportunity.”

	The evidence for the original charge against Trump was largely obtained through Urban League testers — white and black — who sought apartments in various Trump-owned complexes. Whites got them; blacks didn’t. The case was also based on a series of individual complaints to Eleanor Holmes Norton, then chairperson of the city’s Human Rights Commission. Norton resolved a half-dozen individual cases by compelling Trump to admit black complainants. She asked the federal government to look for a pattern. But perhaps the most compelling evidence came from Trump employees and former employees.

	According to court records, four superintendents or rental agents confirmed that applications sent to the central office for acceptance or rejection were coded by race. Three doormen were told to discourage blacks who came seeking apartments when the manager was out, either by claiming no vacancies or hiking up the rents. A super said he was instructed to send black applicants to the central office but to accept white applications on site. Another rental agent said that Fred Trump had instructed him not to rent to blacks. Further, the agent said Trump wanted “to decrease the number of black tenants” already in the development “by encouraging them to locate housing elsewhere.”

	Donald Trump charged in the press that the suit was part of a “nationwide drive to force owners of moderate and luxury apartments to rent to welfare recipients.”

	“We are not going to be forced by anyone to put people…in our buildings to the detriment of tenants who have, for many years, lived in these buildings, raised families in them, and who plan to continue to live there. That would be reverse discrimination,” he said. “The government is not going to experiment with our buildings to the detriment of ourselves and the thousands who live in them now.”


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/08/24/upshot/how-redlinings-racist-effects-lasted-for-decades.html
    How Redlining’s Racist Effects Lasted for Decades
    
    The appraiser who went to Brooklyn in the 1930s to assess Bedford-Stuyvesant for the government summarized the neighborhood’s prospects on a single page. Many brownstones in “obsolescence and poor upkeep.” Clerks, laborers and merchants lived there, about 30 percent of them foreign-born, Jews and Irish mostly.

    Also, this: “Colored infiltration a definitely adverse influence on neighborhood desirability.”

    ...The lines they helped draw, based in large part on the belief that the presence of blacks and other minorities would undermine property values, altered what would happen in these communities for years to come.


http://chicagopolicyreview.org/2014/01/29/separate-and-suffering-the-damaging-effects-of-residential-segregation-on-metropolitan-economies/
    President Lyndon B. Johnson signed the Fair Housing Act, which prohibited housing discrimination and put an end to one of the last vestiges of legal segregation in the United States, into law in 1968. Yet, nearly half a century later, residential segregation persists in virtually every major city in the country.

    ...In “Residential Segregation, Spatial Mismatch and Economic Growth across US Metropolitan Areas,” researchers Huiping Li, Harrison Campbell, and Steven Fernandez examine the short- and long-term consequences of residential segregation on the economic growth of metropolitan areas in the United States, taking into special consideration the interplay between spatial mismatch and skill complementarity in American cities. Spatial mismatch refers to the idea that residential segregation reduces job opportunities for low-income individuals who may find themselves physically located far from potential places of work, while skill complementarity refers to the ratio of high- and low-skilled workers necessary for an economy to exhibit optimal growth. A lack of skill complementarity due to the separation of the city’s low- and high-skilled workforces may inhibit economic growth. Indeed, the researchers find that residential segregation has a negative effect on the overall economic welfare of cities in large part because it acts as a barrier to skill complementarity, which drives income growth across all economic levels downward.

    ...They find that in the entire 1980-2005 period, high levels of initial segregation are associated with slower levels of economic growth over the subsequent 25 years;


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/08/24/upshot/how-redlinings-racist-effects-lasted-for-decades.html
	...The maps became self-fulfilling prophesies, as “hazardous” neighborhoods — “redlined” ones — were starved of investment and deteriorated further in ways that most likely also fed white flight and rising racial segregation. These neighborhood classifications were later used by the Veterans Administration and the Federal Housing Administration to decide who was worthy of home loans at a time when homeownership was rapidly expanding in postwar America.

	“Housing policy can have a really long-lasting impact, since structures last a long time,” Mr. Hartley said.

	...Blacks who did not have access to conventional home loans had to turn to schemes like contract sales that entailed steep interest rates (the practice is returning today in many of these same communities). Because those homes could be frequently repossessed by predatory lenders, these neighborhoods would experience more population instability.

	Slumlords, too, would move in, squeezing value from subdivided rental homes that otherwise might have been owned by families. Commercial investors, meanwhile, would have stayed away. Blacks discriminated against in the housing market elsewhere would have had limited options to move away.

https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/inside-the-governments-racial-bias-case-against-donald-trumps-company-and-how-he-fought-it/2016/01/23/fb90163e-bfbe-11e5-bcda-62a36b394160_story.html
	When a black woman asked to rent an apartment in a Brooklyn complex managed by Donald Trump’s real estate company, she said she was told that nothing was available. A short time later, a white woman who made the same request was invited to choose between two available apartments.

	The two would-be renters on that July 1972 day were actually undercover “testers” for a ­government-sanctioned investigation to determine whether Trump Management Inc. discriminated against minorities seeking housing at properties across Brooklyn and Queens.

	Federal investigators also gathered evidence.


https://www.villagevoice.com/2015/07/20/how-a-young-donald-trump-forced-his-way-from-avenue-z-to-manhattan/
	...In March 1974, Donald Trump testified as president of many of the Trump housing companies. He assumed a color-blind posture throughout much of the questioning, claiming he “had no idea of the racial composition” of his tenants or employees (he lapsed when he described “an all-black job in Washington,” and conceded that the company owned projects that were 100 percent white).

	He was, he continued, “unfamiliar” with the Fair Housing Act of 1969, and said that the company had made no changes in its rental policies since the law’s passage.


https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC4808815/
	The Fair Housing Act passed in the wake of Martin Luther King’s assassination in an effort to address, at least symbolically, the anger of African Americans who were rioting in the nation’s ghettos. For the first time in American history legislation banned racial discrimination in the sale or rental of housing. At the time, levels of black residential segregation were extreme, higher than any group had ever experienced before or since.

	...Recent research indicates that the concentration of neighborhood disadvantage imposed by residential segregation is the leading reason for the perpetuation of black poverty and the main explanation for the stalling of progress toward racial equality (Sampson 2012; Sharkey 2013). ...As Schwemm (1989:47) once noted “Congress made a promise in 1968 that the Fair Housing Act cannot keep.” Nearly 50 years after the passage Fair Housing Act, making good on that promise is long overdue.


https://www.villagevoice.com/2015/07/20/how-a-young-donald-trump-forced-his-way-from-avenue-z-to-manhattan/
	...I asked Donald Trump why he’d stopped advertising vacancies in the Amsterdam News when the two-year court mandate had expired. “It’s a neighborhood paper for Harlem,” he said.



http://talkingpointsmemo.com/muckraker/trump-charlottesville-heritage-same-rhetoric-white-nationalists-use-recruit
	Frank Meeink, a former neo-Nazi who left the movement after a stint in prison as a teenager for kidnapping one man and beating another, told TPM that he used those sort of “common sense,” pseudo-academic appeals to recruit residents of his South Philadelphia neighborhood into his skinhead gang.

	“It’s the biggest bait and switch. You’re down and out and people are saying, ‘Come be proud of your heritage, they’re telling you you can’t be, come join our group!’” Meeink said of his efforts to “pitch” to new recruits.

	“You join the group and not once did these guys talk about their heritage in meetings,” Meeink went on. “Never went to a meeting where they were like, ‘Hey, let’s talk about Leif Erikson again!’ All we talked about was, ‘Look at what the Jews are doing to our culture,’ but we never talked about what our culture did, it was what they’re doing. You’re not taught about your heritage; you’re taught about why other heritages aren’t as good.”

	...Trump, who himself once argued in favor of removing the Confederate flag from public spaces, has showed no signs of contrition, lashing out at critics in the media and on Capitol Hill and defending his recent comments as inherently harmless. Speaking with the imprimatur of the White House, Trump has taken these bogus historical arguments mainstream.


https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/mvke38/all-the-evidence-we-could-find-about-fred-trumps-alleged-involvement-with-the-kkk
	In subsequent years, as Donald Trump morphed into a grandstanding tabloid celebrity, he developed a reputation for agitating the public about racially-charged issues. In 1989, he faced national criticism over full-page ads he took out in New York newspapers, warning of "roving bands of wild criminals" and calling for the return of the death penalty in a veiled reference to the Central Park Five.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Central_Park_jogger_case
	Five juvenile males—four black and one of Hispanic descent—were tried variously for assault, robbery, riot, rape, sexual abuse, and attempted murder. Based solely on confessions that they said were coerced and false, and despite the fact that DNA tests on the rape kit excluded them as the source, they were convicted in 1990 by juries in two separate trials. They received sentences ranging from 5 to 15 years. Four of the convictions were appealed; they were affirmed by appellate courts. The defendants spent between 6 and 13 years in prison.

	In 2002, Matias Reyes, a serial rapist in prison, confessed to raping the jogger, and DNA evidence confirmed his guilt.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2015/06/16/full-text-donald-trump-announces-a-presidential-bid/
    Full text: Donald Trump announces a presidential bid

    The U.S. has become a dumping ground for everybody else's problems.

    (APPLAUSE)

    Thank you. It's true, and these are the best and the finest. When Mexico sends its people, they're not sending their best. They're not sending you. They're not sending you. They're sending people that have lots of problems, and they're bringing those problems with us. They're bringing drugs. They're bringing crime. They're rapists. And some, I assume, are good people.

    But I speak to border guards and they tell us what we're getting. And it only makes common sense. It only makes common sense. They're sending us not the right people.


https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/mvke38/all-the-evidence-we-could-find-about-fred-trumps-alleged-involvement-with-the-kkk
	Late last month, in an interview with Republican frontrunner Donald Trump, CNN host Jake Tapper asked the candidate whether he would disavow an endorsement from longtime Ku Klux Klan leader and white nationalist celebrity David Duke. Trump declined. "I don't know anything about David Duke," he said. Moments later, he added, "I know nothing about white supremacists."

	Trump has since walked back his comments, blaming his hesitance to condemn the Klan on a "bad earpiece."



http://talkingpointsmemo.com/muckraker/trump-charlottesville-heritage-same-rhetoric-white-nationalists-use-recruit
	German, the former FBI agent, emphasized that people don’t simply transform into white nationalists overnight, pointing to recent studies showing an increase in U.S. hate groups.

	“I always ask myself, ‘Okay is it that people who weren’t racist yesterday decide, you know what, I think I’ll be a racist!’” he joked. “I don’t think so.”

	“I tend to believe that these are feelings that a sizable segment of the population holds and is reluctant to express, because they know its not social acceptable to say these things,” he added. “When you have someone like Donald Trump say them from a campaign podium or platform, that makes it okay to say them. That has brought out a lot of this latent racism to full expression. And that expression then influences our policy and the way we enforce the law.”

 

https://www.nytimes.com/politics/first-draft/2016/01/25/woody-guthrie-sang-of-his-contempt-for-his-landlord-donald-trumps-father/
	More than a half-century ago, the folk singer Woody Guthrie signed a lease in an apartment complex in Brooklyn. He soon had bitter words for his landlord: Donald J. Trump’s father, Fred C. Trump.

	Mr. Guthrie, in writings uncovered by a scholar working on a book, invoked “Old Man Trump” while suggesting that blacks were unwelcome as tenants in the Trump apartment complex, near Coney Island.

	“He thought that Fred Trump was one who stirs up racial hate, and implicitly profits from it,” the scholar, Will Kaufman, a professor of American literature and culture at the University of Central Lancashire in Britain, said in an interview.

	...I suppose

	Old Man Trump knows

	Just how much

	Racial Hate

	he stirred up

	In the bloodpot of human hearts

